Quiet words of “I love you” flows past her lips into my ear, as we embrace in the cover of the darken room
Jesus loves you, not him
The door exploded in a magnesium-bright flash and men, possibly robots, my five year old brain told me, in gleaming white armour burst through the door blasters blasting. It's quite possible at this point that my mouth was hanging so far open that my jaw had actually dislocated. There may even have been drool.
(I guess the hot water supply at the camp
Don't try to spout Rammstein lyrics in public unless you want to get funny looks/slapped/arrested. If, while being carried off by the police after getting arrested, you happen to call them 'nazis' they will not take it well. Most of them still have a stigma about it. If you are getting talked to in German, don't assume they are mad, unless they are spitting vigorously. Guttural yelling generated a lot of saliva.
So it's no surprise the theme for our challenge is:
Workout: Did cleaning again
2. For light users wanting one of the latest, most powerful smartphones with a decent data allowance we have the HTC One X on O2 for £27 a month. It comes with 200 minutes, 500MB and unlimited texts.
Update: Since posting, I've received some emails for 15% off blog books. Darn I missed out on saving an additional 5% but you can! I would recommend signing up for both Blog 2 Print and Cutest Blog on the Book emails since I received one email that advertised 10% off and another that advertised 15% off at the same time and for the exact same service.
“Well, well, well…boys, looky here…it’s a widdle puddy tat.” From somewhere a long way off, Malcolm could hear Butch’s taunting voice. Worse, he could smell Butch..and if he thought that crazy dog at the dumpster stunk, well…he smelled like roses compared to Butch.
and we know you are all busy,
Ryan Braun gave 110% in his first career three home run game last night at Petco Park.
Yesterday I talked a lot about fitted clothing, and shoes for men. Remember first impressions count!
It is true. Many thanks to my friend for pointing out this obvious yet often ignored philosophy in our life. When we hike, the harder the trail is, the nicer the view will be. So hold onto our dream, keep walking, and always look forward to the amazing view in our life.
R. Tanlangwidge
I remember ordering a crab salad and Mike encouraged me to also have a glass of white wine. Once our lunch had arrived, and we were chatting comfortably, Mike said "I really would like to go to bed with you." I nearly choked and almost fell off my chair.
Fleetwood Mac Go your own way UK
1 egg.
2 cups Egyptian rice or short grain rice, washed and strained
Throughout the 1970s, I argued over a thousand supper parties that, between 1945 and 1952, the US could have obliterated the USSR free from the fear of reprisal…..but chose not to. At Reykjavik many years later, Gorbachev himself admitted to Reagan that he was well aware that the US could even then have knocked out all the major Russian urban centres with minimal casualties on the American side….but chose not to.
Microsoft Publisher is all you need to make a professional press kit to send out to agents or publishing houses. Include in your materials the market research you've done to show how the writing can be profitable, and include the best bits of material from the work. You'll have to find the right balance between providing enough pertinent info and overwhelming the audience with data.
Right now the Prince and Duchess are in Canada (and soon the US- eek). I saw her on the news today and my heart melted a little. Yes- I wish I was her (or at least looked like- er dressed like her).
till I was 10. It caused a certain isolation for me as a child. It was particularly difficult cos I grew up in East London, which is not the best place to be when your're different."
How the MP3 Technology Works
Until a month later.
I will be the first to admit that I loved reading the VA series from Rose's perspective, but with BLOODLINES being told from Sydney Sage's point of view it was pretty refreshing. Yes she isn't as tough as Rose but as the story progresses we see how she begins to become her own person. At the end of VA Sydney was in trouble with the Alchemists for helping Rose escape so we see how she still treads lightly around them but will do anything to get back in their good graces.
While I'm normally drawn to the natural, Moi, Rafael and Serendipity. I find that a bond of partners through time is not only important, but for me right now, timely.
The Hanged Man. Fear death by water.
I stopped short. Regent was sitting, unmoving, and in the last ten seconds or so, Shadow Stalker had disappeared from the chair.
Explained Crystal Vision’s Managing Director, Philip Scofield: “Fibre connectivity continues to get easier and cheaper to build into a system. Most Crystal Vision products have both fibre and electrical inputs and outputs. Where there isn’t a fibre output on a device, the FTX-L 3G is a convenient way of connecting the two systems. The added electrical loop-through has allowed a large saving of distribution amplifiers for one of Europe’s national broadcasters and is a sign of Crystal Vision products developing to suit the needs of the high-volume users.”
As they headed down the main path, here came the little skinny kid.
July-Work on Utility
Trim to edge the pocket (I used rick rack)
this is definitely more of an outfit i'd expect of lily ;)
A couple of Fridays ago was Dr Seusss' birthday. I'm sure it was no coincidence that our local library was hosting a Dr Seuss story session. I've been to these sessions before and while they're fun, they involve loads of parents and kids squished in to a room and I'm really not sure it was something that O would like. Also, it was a glorious day.
There was a lot of silence (as you might imagine). Then, I heard from a couple families. I wasn't experienced with this. Both eventually said no. I heard a lot of opinions. I was told to let him die peacefully in DRC. I was told that there wasn't much of a chance for him, that no one would adopt a child with a likely death sentence. It was a dark time. I really felt like I wasn't supposed to give up on him, despite how crazy it sounded and everyone telling me to let it go. Yet, doors weren't opening. And how long could a (now 7 year old) child live in DRC in an orphanage with a heart condition that required 3 cardiac medicines to keep him semi-stable?
23 Kontroll Csoport - Nem En Vagyok
“Two men are enemies,” the Corsican said. “They decide to kill each other. One is big. The other is small. They fight with fists. The small man cannot get near the big man. The small man is the most nimble. But the big man chases him. Eventually, he should catch him, and kill him. Now give to each man a knife. The small man is still at a disadvantage. The big man has more reach. It’s difficult to penetrate his wide guard. But the small man is the more nimble. His thrusts are the quicker. And knife-fighting is a question of courage. Perhaps the big one feels faint when he thinks he may die. Or when he sees blood. The battle is more even. It is more dirty to fight with fists than with knives. To attack another man with fists is a dirty trick, requiring little courage, but only bestial strength.” This Corsican was biased, being an expert with the knife he carried and ate and shaved with. It was a long curving blade, with a delicately curved, black bone handle, I recall. But I thoroughly agreed, and agree with his sentiments. To hell with adventure novelists who decry every man who draws a knife and lionise honest John who fights with his fists.
I got a shirt from GAP that I absolutely love! The same style as below but in a blush color. And I even got one with white and coral stripes. That style shirt fit me perfectly! Favorite shirt status! But then....
Run and buy this book when it comes out, you will not regret it.
“Post Diptych” – A pair (obviously) of photographs, lovely white and grey tones, one of a wooden triangular structure like a giant dog kennel in a bare field of earth; the other a tree study, which close up, contains a trellis like structure. One of those things that draws your eye across a room. More next time.
Jeans: J.Crew
Besides the health, financial, and environmental reasons, there is of course the ethical reason. Is it correct that 70 Billion animals are raised each year only to become food for humans? The vast majority of these animals live lives of such unimaginable squalor and suffering as to dull the senses. There seems to be a widespread idea that animals, for some reason, don’t feel pain or suffering like humans, or that they only exist to feed humans. These are such juvenile ideas that they would almost be laughable if they weren’t so repugnant. Notwithstanding the active abuse dished out to untold numbers of animals and the horrible conditions that they inhabit during their short, sad lives, the worst part of this issue is the fact that most humans feel that there is nothing wrong in our very mentally which justifies the slavery and subservience of all other animals to our appetites and whims, and that humans are naturally superior and ordained to dominate and rule the earth because we are the most intelligent species. This is an example of an intelligence I want no part of. We are animals too, and this slavery and abuse is unacceptable and should not be tolerated or even allowed.
The following is from a post I wrote last week on the blog my sister and I are updating during our time here at Heartland. If you would like to stay current with us, visit our blog at emilynaomihbbc.blogspot.com.
The shape of my card is Spellbinders Floral Ovals. Here is a little design tip for you: The cutting edges of this die template are very intricate so removing those thin little swirls may be a little tricky...To make removing the cut image a snap simply layer a piece of wax paper between the die template and the cardstock. Voila! A perfectly cut image that comes right out of those tight little corners :)
A couple of days ago my hubby and I took Kid A out to eat for her seventeenth birthday. While we were out partying, my sweet neighbor tended our other three children. Now, for those of you new to this blog, my two boys--Kids B and C--are mentally disabled. While they are teenagers in body, they are about eight developmentally and have limited speech.
5. Waltz of Decay and Pestilence - 12:02
Hello my friends!!!*grin*
Perhaps even more than those famed taboo subjects, religion and politics, the topic of sex is one that almost immediately generates radically opposed, basically inarguable positions. In the comics-blogosphere, it may even top the fabled "Stan vs. Jack" arguments.
Here's my version::
Pauline enjoys reading, watching movies and socialising with friends.
The bill, which passed the full Senate earlier this month, would require all state sexual education classes to “exclusively and emphatically” promote abstinence while banning teachers from promoting any form of “gateway sexual activity.” The latter term, which has garnered national media attention and been lampooned by comedian Stephen Colbert, is not specifically defined in the bill.
In the last two days, we have received numerous emails from netizens regarding on how they can assist the family of the late Mr Chandra Mogan.
Black Duck Brewery Great beers on show especialy the PROPER bitter lovely beer could've drank it all day... and that has nothing to do with the fact it has PROPER in its name I swear (^_^).
He smiled affectionately at the girl in his hands. She shuddered as he slowed his caress, released his touch, and sat back, totally still. One minute. Five minutes, completely enjoying the fear mounting in her body.
Or walk with Kings—nor lose the common touch,
I think every year of my life I’ve had a real tree at Christmas – we were just a real tree family growing up and I continued that tradition.
Dry roast methi seeds and hing. Keep aside.
62 tell
goodmorning.bloggies :)
So, for the record, things I'd like to remember (in no particular order):
· "Tell a Friend" feature to send an online invitation to family and friends to join the NVIC Advocacy team
Nothing spells gloom like My Dying Bride, a band that has been at the forefront of the doom metal genre since their inception in the early 90′s. Though emotionally and thematically very much in the wake of their past material, Evinta rids itself of guitars and all other typical instruments in favor of classical instruments, creating a powerful, epic, atmospheric, expansive (3-disc) ambient/neo-classical experience.
And then came our favorite comment: "Wow, I thought you were a lot older." We must have looked surprised, because the commenter added: "You know, I thought you were a bunch of older nuns from Bulgaria singing and here you are, so young..." We told him to quit while he was ahead.
Trim the stringing material, if needed, so that the fringe at the bottom is even and about 1-inch long.
Jesus’ maxim of rendering unto Caesar that which is Caesar’s and unto God that which is God’s is advice that is timeless and should be adhered to at all times. Unfortunately, many in religious circles seemed to have forgotten this critical piece of advice and the damage to society has been incalculable.
Brookes University, Oxford 5th February 2001
3. You may wish to write a letter or note to the person (you don’t need to send it – it’s all about releasing your feelings and attachment to the pain, and letting it go via the writing process), or say what you want either verbally or in your mind. You can pour your heart out and say all the things youv’e been wanting to say or that have built up inside you, up to you how you go about it. Be honest. Be specific.
In the cold light of day
When Grace awakens, she's no longer in her own body. As she roams the hospital hallway, she finds that her daughter, Jenny, is having the same experience. Grace learns that she has suffered irreversible brain damage, and Jenny has severe burns all over her body and face. The prognosis for both of them is bleak and to further complicate matters, arson is the suspected cause of the fire.
The leg movement, colloquially known as the “frog kick” or “whip kick”, consists of two phases: bringing the feet into position for the thrust phase and the insweep phase. From the initial position with the legs stretched out backward, the feet are moved together towards the posterior, while the knees stay together. The knees should not sink too low, as this increases the drag. Then the feet point outward in preparation for the thrust phase. In the thrust phase, the legs are moved elliptically back to the initial position. During this movement, the knees are kept together. The legs move slower while bringing the legs into position for the thrust phase, and move very fast during the thrust phase. Again, the goal is produce maximum thrust during the in sweep phase, and minimum drag during the recovery phase. In the recovery phase the lower leg and the feet are in the wake of the upper leg, and the feet are pointed to the rear. In the thrust phase all three parts create their own wake, and the flat end of the feet acts like a hydrofoil aligned to give maximum forward thrust. The resulting drag coefficient (or more precisely the frontal area) is thus doubled in the thrust phase.
In the New Testament, the word used for “spirit” is pneuma; however, Paul in First Corinthians 15:44 used the words: soma pneuma (“σωμα πνευματικον”) which means “spiritual body”. This is the type of body that we, as believers in Jesus, will also be raised with. A week after Jesus had resurrected, Scripture says he was still around for at least one week before his ascension (John 20:26). The resurrected Jesus walked around, made himself known to many people, and he showed himself in a resurrected spiritual-physical body to over 500 people. He was definitely not in hiding. The bible is clear about the form of Jesus’ resurrected body. The onus is on doubters to disprove that Jesus resurrected in a physical-spiritual body.
“I’m sure they were just too poor to be able to care for a child with a heart condition. So they made the best, most loving decision they could under the circumstances.”
could determine his choice of a tempo for that performance.
Why has there not been any serious public criticism of the determined impropriety of having completely nude women and men (standing a yard apart), shamelessly facing each other in a doorway, between whom visitors must squeeze in order to enter a popular exhibition these days in the Museum of Modern Art in New York City? Is not gross impropriety evident both on the part of those who mount such a display and on the part of those who attend this two-month-long exhibit in large numbers? Do not such ugly indulgences testify to an ominous decadence among our most privileged fellow-citizens, a deterioration that corrupts everyone involved, recklessly undermining thereby the moral foundations of our republican institutions? Complete Article
Well Alright.
Woohoo! My favourite part of the NHL hockey season is here -- the Stanley Cup playoffs! I always try to cheer for a Canadian team but unfortunately, the Vancouver Canucks and the Ottawa Senators were both defeated in the first round. So I don't know who I'll cheer for now. I'll wait until the last two teams are contending for the Cup and then pick one.
As it was, I followed a careful diet for the first 8 weeks of the program. I ate lean meats, nothing fried, lots of vegetables, extra protein. I stayed very close to the ingredients they listed in the plan. In two months, I had zero burgers, one order of fries, and two slices of pizza. I even limited my beer intake to about 2 a week. For me, this dietary discipline is as impressive as sticking to a workout plan 6 days a week for 3 months.
Let me back up though right here. I’d like to clarify that my anti-bullying classroom atmosphere was built from minute-one with my classes. My students knew my stance on it from the moment they entered my room. I also took great and carefully planned steps to build a solid classroom community the first two weeks of school. Curriculum was introduced, but it was always through the lens of community building. I wanted every single student to feel safe and important and part of the community of learners.
Obviously, America is not a post-racist country. The blurry line dividing the other two appellations — racism and racialism — is crossed daily in overt and subtle ways. The line’s vagueness and the sometimes inadvertent crossing of it reflect the very different American experiences of blacks and whites. The recent shooting death in Sanford,Florida, of unarmed, 17-year-old Trayvon Martin by a self-appointed neighborhood watch captain, for instance, was seen by many blacks as another instance of racial profiling. But feelings of outrage and sadness and a demand for justice crossed all racial borders.
Anyway, back to my mood, I was doing a lot of talking to God last night...just asking for help...when I realized that I still have about three months of anti-depressants that might help me stay out of the dark hole. That should help me a little, if not just a placebo effect, until I get re-approved for my health care.
Thanks Chuck!!
She was breathing deeply, she forgot the cold, the weight of beings, the insane static life, the lone languish of living or dying. After so many years running from fear, fleeing crazily, uselessly, she was finally coming to a halt. At the same time she seemed to be recovering her roots, and the sap rose anew in her body, which was no longer trembling. Pressing her whole body against the parapet, leaning toward the wheeling sky, she was only waiting for her pounding heart to settle down, and for the silence to form in her. The last constellations of stars fell in bunches a little lower on the horizon of the desert, and stood motionless. Then, with an unbearable sweetness, the waters of the night began to fill her, submerging the cold, rising, gradually to the center of her being, and overflowing wave upon wave to her moaning mouth. A moment later, the whole sky stretched out above her as she lay with her back against the cold earth.
Sadly I cannot find a website for Donald Rissler’s work and some of his pieces were just incredible …but you can get an idea of the scale and intricacy from this.
U.S. Trade Representative Ron Kirk said in an e-mail, "Cachaça and bourbon and Tennessee whiskey are among the United States’ and Brazil’s most unique and well-recognized products. This exchange of letters represents a very positive development for both of our industries, and reflects our governments’ commitment to stronger bilateral trade ties.”
Two estate agents came to value the cottage. If we were to sell, which we aren't, neither would have the privilege of selling it for us. The first came early before I was ready, fortunately husband was able to let him in. The second was late. Neither apologised. Uncannily they both valued the cottage at the same disappointing figure. Considerably less than the larger house next door which is currently for sale. This is the very same house that I recently wrote about being two council tax bands below our cottage. It has the same number of rooms as our cottage, although it is larger. More space means higher bills. The next door house also has a bigger garden. Our garden is big enough for us. We do not want to have to spend all day cutting the lawn. Whoever buys it will be paying a high price for the extra space. Both agents said that the next door house was over priced.
This shrew was in Colby Gardens in Pembrokeshire, snuffling for worms under a sheet of galvanised metal that I happened to lift up. In a way it was lucky I came along, because the sheets are placed to attract snakes which would happily accept a shrew-sized meal. Last spring, lifting the same sheet, I found the most gorgeous grass snake, chocolate brown with a golden band, like a collar round its neck (can snakes have necks?).
Those who wish the universe to end in disorder, with no more than a whimper are not willing to sit by as others race to alter the end universe. As these opposing forces mount their defenses, racing to see their goals are achieved one question stands out…
If you have any information about the true identity of “Lyle Stevik”, or if you have any information about the case, call the number below:
And I wonder now when I will knit.
Helium seems easy to write for, both of the articles that I wrote have been accepted but then I don't see how the aren't. It was like you write, you post and it's there. As yet I haven't been able to work out how you get paid. My friend who does this type of writing to pay the bills since she lost her job said the same thing so she doesn't write for them much so I might follow her lead on that one for now.
Angels, upper heaven, secrets and God
(7) The Court of Industrial Relations should, in all controversial questions, render its decision in such a manner that the parties to the proceeding can know the vario issues involved, and the reasons for the decisions rendered. The performance of this duty is inseparable from the authority conferred upon it.
We spent Thursday hanging out at Mom’s, enjoyed a majorly awesome meal (where Jeremy and Grandpa split turkey carving duty), and then began the trek back to Kalamazoo. We got home at about 11 PM and set to unloading. Not the most ideal time to unload but since the truck was due back at 2 pm and I had to work Black Friday from 7 a.m. – 3 p.m. at Bath & Body Works… there weren’t many other options.
Cloven in the last great wall of all the world.
This man choose to starve himself - and I have felt all along that is his option. We did not deny him food. That was always his option - his treatment was always better than what Gilad received and still he complained. And worse, the Israeli government has caved in. Khadar Adnan will go free - I can only wish his victims...past and future, had such a luxury. Each murder by Islamic Jihad in the future - will be because today, terror and blackmail was rewarded.
Not sure yet, I am sure most people think they look the same !! I will have to play a bit more.
-Started to show much more of a personality (although you've had such a personality since day one.)
It is a question of faith, not one for science.
First though, a big thank you to our group break sponsor!
The host of the group—knowing a little of my difficulties in such settings—makes a few attempts to draw me out by calling my name and asking what I think of such-and-such. Silence reigns as every pair of eyes turns my way. I read in them the question: “What’s wrong with you that you need encouragement to talk?” I look at the host who is smiling a self-congratulatory smile that seems to say, “I’ve done my part; now let’s see you do yours,” and I mumble something—I don’t know what. The discussion soon moves away from me like a receding tide behind which I lie choked and battered.
I believe that things happen for a reason. Let me elaborate.
Mattie is a singular character. Though a young girl, she bosses about as if she were a man twice her age. And she gets her way most of the time. She gets the business deal she wants on the horses her father had purchased, and she hires US Marshal Rooster Cogburn to pursue Chaney with her in tow. She is determined to hire Cogburn because, according to the sheriff, he of all the marshals is the meanest. “He is a pitiless man, double-tough, and fear don’t enter into his thinking.” Mattie observes Cogburn giving testimony in court, where the defense attorney for outlaw Odus Wharton implies that Cogburn is an outlaw himself for his excessive force and shoot-first-ask-questions-later approach to law enforcement. For Mattie, this means, Cogburn has “true grit”.
Thank you for releasing that info, Ms. John, even if it was in response to another call. Given our persistent culture of secrecy, especially in public matters, it is a welcome change.
NFSU 2Need For Dispatch Underground 2
Total time: 25 minutes
He said despite a whole series of operations against illegal immigrants, nothing has actually changed and the problem remained unsolved.
In my ever changing moods, who knew just a little over a year ago, when I started to freak about what to do with my new time on my hands, that I would start a bread business, help the cheerleader on her collegiate path, start another business, Girl With Far Away Eyes, and be forced to come out of denial that college is no longer something off in the future?
Susan’s background is in screenplay writing and her book is like reading little snippets of scenes – beautifully told with fantastic imagery, this memoir is inspirational and a great read for anyone, no matter what your current life situation is like. It may give you the motivation to make the changes you’ve always wanted to make but have been afraid to do. Susan has admitted she’s not afraid of taking chances any longer because of her stay in Italy. I would love to be that brave and strong!
Earlier this month, the staff at EW and the AACC were challenged by founder, Dr. Tim Clinton with this, "Don't Miss Christmas!" At first you would think, "How can we miss Christmas?" Christmas trees for sale, Santas at every party and store, "Lowest Price of the Year" sales, lights, etc. etc. etc. Right?!
The trumpet can be started with a magic circle. I did swap to this method after a while in order to close the hole that appears in the middle. I only starched the petals , the trumpet is fine. Originally this was made to fit a Sibol square and I will be using it as such but as you can see I went on to make a garland. I hope some of you might be tempted to have a crack at this. They do cheer up a miserable day.
The Southern Bridal Expo is scheduled for this weekend. R and I are meeting up with my best friend (and MOH) to check out the vendors and maybe get a few ideas. We are also going to visit a few bridal shops to look at bridesmaid dresses. I'm looking for something pink, maybe in a flowy chiffon fabric. My MOH went last weekend and tried on several dresses so I could get an idea of whats available and one of them was adorable. I can definitely imagine it alongside my dress.
music. . . Pink Moon, Nick Drake
3 cups unbleached white flour
Ink: Walnut Stain Distress ink by Ranger
Prepare your boss / teacher / place of business that you won’t be wearing shoes that day and tell them why. Encourage some other folks to do it with you. And don’t do it to get a pat on the back. Do it simply to encourage people to love the poor in a tangible way. It’s an easy thing to do that also raises our own awareness about how much we take for granted that we do have shoes.
BHtL weren't cookie-cutter punks, but some of the more "routine" songs in their repertoire ("Violet Actions," "Tar and Feather," "Northern Colony," etc) certainly bordered that periphery. Fortunately they compensated with a generous amount of diversity among quite a few of the remaining numbers, most startlingly in the shape of the relatively ambient instrumental "Desert Song." The quartet saves their aces for the second half of the show, with two particular standouts. "Poetry" exhibits serious power pop flirtations a la a rawer, more muscular Mitch Easter production. It gets better. "What I Believe" is this tape's crown jewel, bearing a classic Bob Mould-inspired guitar workout, nearly passing for a primo Metal Circus or Zen Arcade outtake. Brilliant. Luckily. these two numbers appear on side two (tracks 7-12), which sounds demonstrably more lucid than this tape's preceding first half which is far too muffled and bassy. I tried to play around with the equalization, but all the tweaking in the world won't substitute for a cleaner tape. There's yet another snag, and a fairly significant one at that. When the reel on side two ends, so does the last tune ("When Mommy Comes Home Drunk") midstream. Even so, you get a good ninety seconds of it.
And I will leave you with a photo I took earlier this week from my front garden. I may have captured the scene, but only God could have created something so beautiful and amazing.
When I was in California last year I noticed that there was such a thing as Sushi Mexican. And no, I’m not referring to cute little tortillas dressed up like sushi. But actual deep fried sushi rolls, seaweed and all, with some guacamole from a tube. I wasn’t sure how to react. I have also accidentally found myself eating at an Italian sushi restaurant, because there’s nothing like a side of raw salmon to accompany a margherita pizza…really? um. Poor sushi, thrown from pillar to post in its adopted homes. Even our local mall has a sushi bar which specialises in nice safe fillings of fried chicken, fried prawn, nothing too sushi-like.
Own where you are. Now, blaming yourself for everything under the sun is NOT the same as owning where you are. By owning it, I'm simply saying, you are where you are because of your choices.
The purpose of the public poll is to bring as many viewers to our team blog as possible, increasing awareness of Etsy Beadweavers and our art form. The winner of the public poll should be the work that the most viewers liked the best. Promote the challenge by inviting as many friends, acquaintances, co-workers and family members as you like to vote for their favorite entry. Please use your blog, Facebook, Twitter and any other resources you have to drive traffic to our blog during the challenge. Feel free to say which entry is yours. Many friends will choose to support you with a vote. But please DO NOT request that your friends vote for your work, or that of another member. Please let them make up their own minds about which entry they like the best. Let’s play fair with each other, and keep our challenges fun for all.
We bring the curtain down on 2011 with friends in fromage recalling the memorable cheeses that crossed their palates this year. It’s a tradition at CheeseLover.ca we started last year.
Today is my 30th birthday. I’m spending it doing things that I really like to do. Seven mile foot march in the morning, eating McDonalds for lunch, seeing Act of Valor on Fort Benning, and then seeing the Russian National Ballet perform Cinderella at the RiverCenter in Columbus.
Then — the 1980s and 1990s — as now, clerics on Saudi TV were obsessed with women and their orifices, especially what came out of them. I’ll never forget hearing that if a baby boy urinated on you, you could go ahead and pray in the same clothes, yet if a baby girl peed on you, you had to change. What on Earth in the girl’s urine made you impure? I wondered.
Three books so far. One rests in a drawer. A thriller, Mothers Don't Die. One is being sent out somewhat sporadically. Standing Stones introduces the MacDonnell clan during the Scottish Industrial Revolution. The current work in progress, Years of Stone, set in Tasmania mid 19th Century, steams right along.
I did my workout shortly after getting home. Today was Cardio Axe and Tummy Tuck. So, cardio and ab work. I've done both of these before, but not for several months. I forgot how much fun the dancing in Cardio Axe is! I just love it, and I continue to love Leandro's fun, vibrant personality. The only complaint I have with this workout is I would like it to be a little longer and/or a little more intense. It does make me sweat, but not as much as a lot of my other cardio DVDs. As for Tummy Tuck, I now remember why it's been so long since I've done this one. The routine is very good, and I'm sure it will give me nice abs, but I just don't like it very much. It involves a lot of crunches, which I'm not a big fan of (neck straining galore), and a lot of plank work. Which I actually do like, but not for about five minutes total. My shoulders are just screaming at me by the end, to the point where I can't focus on the actual ab work that's being done. I much prefer the Ab Jam routine from Turbo Jam or a couple other DVDs that I have. But it's all good. I will do that workout when I need to and completely love the rest of the program.
For the table names we used important places to us in Ireland for the US guests and important places to us in New York City for the Irish guests.
The plants need a lot of caring and nurturing for them to grow right. Watering them morning and afternoon, cultivating the soil and checking them regularly are some ways to help the plants grow. For the garden to come into completion, one should not just plant and wait doing nothing. Same is true with our lives, we all have dreams and things that we want to accomplish, but we will not see them turn into reality if we just wait and do nothing. We have to make steps for them to be fulfilled. Planning without right implementation produces nothing. Nurture and do things that add-up to the realization of the vision.
It also gave Stacey a secret. He knew that Mattias didn't know much about cooking. No spice, or assortment of spices, could possibly remove the taste of Andrill from potatoes. Potatoes are like sponges, they soak up every flavor around them. The trick to removing Andrill from them was not in the cooking, but in the sack they were carried in. Stacey's mother, before she died, taught Stacey how to make a sack, and what to make it out of, that cleaned produce in such a way that it pulled out contaminants, like Andrill in general. The flavor of Andrill was out of those potatoes a few hours after Stacey was on the boat. It still made him happy though, because potatoes, like sponges, really have no flavor all by themselves. So, for Mattias to have said anything, Stacey did have his spices right. His mashed potatoes were good. Come out of Andrill and still deserve praise good.
If a Stephen King novel coming out next year had a small bridge in Maine named after it – for the next twenty years – the It 2 Bridge – surely this would not be a bad way to give King's novel near-permanent cultural exposure?
It's like a fog, slowly forming overhead, and steadily getting thicker until it blocks out the sun.
Calculus is still a very timid group, extra afraid of being wrong slash anyone knowing they are wrong, but had lots of fun looking into the "there are always two antipodal points on a great circle at the same temperature" thing today. (Which true confession I'm not totally sure is a good use of Intermediate Value Theorem day but I kind of suspect is it, so I went with it.) There was a distinct, entrenched camp arguing "no," and a diverse, poorly-organized camp valiantly arguing "yes," and the "no's" were very gracious when they realized their position was untenable.
a happy anniversary
Author and Buddhist teacher
The other members of the Crustacea class display “the refracting type eye structure,” which works on completely different principles from those of the reflecting type. Here, the eye is made up of hundreds of cells like a honeycomb. Unlike the square cells in a lobster eye, these cells are either hexagonal or round. Furthermore, instead of reflecting light, small lenses in the cells refract the light onto the focus on the retina.
I have truly learned the value of each day and have a new outlook on life. I am filled with joy and gratitude.
However, it turns out that I've been getting my priorities in a muddle - because having sampled St Peter's 'Organic Ale' I was very swiftly reminded that 'freshness', 'authenticity' and 'a distinct absence of extraneous chemicals and processes' - when assembled together as a code of brewing practice - are pretty much guaranteed to result in the most marvellous of ales.
As a photographer you need to take risks to get THE shot! Also, can you call a life without risk LIVING? I don’t, however each one has to make that out for themselves, how far are you prepared to go.
a. Of great power
Sprinkle the salt and sugar over the cut up vegetables and toss a few times. Set aside for about 10-15 minutes, tossing once or twice.
Recently the possibility of introducing a basic income into South Africa has come up for discussion in a number of research, labour and civil society sources. The idea of a basic income paid to all citizens was raised in 1990 by Leon Louw of the Free Market Foundation in the book Economic Alternatives edited by McGregor (1990). The present author also carried out some unpublished research on the impact of a basic income on the economy on the basis of a social accounting matrix and published some ideas on the basic incomes in the press (Roukens de Lange, 1991). Jeremy Baskin of the Department of Manpower also raised the issue in the press (1993).
... cinnamon is a wonderful fall scent.
What were his activities that sparked investigation? He associated with members of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP). The commission considered the NAACP a group of northern trouble makers who came to cause trouble among the content Negro people. Johnson attended meetings of FOCUS, another so called subversive Negro organization.
The Master also says in Matthew 9 when he is criticized for eating with the sinners:
The dermatologist took one look at the mysterious spots and asked, “Did you happen to handle any limes while you were in Hawaii?”
Now that they’d destroyed her house, she tells them to wash up, hides their clothes with her friendly dry cleaner, gets them track suits and puts them to work to pay for all the damage.
Nowadays, people shack up all the time. They are in no way distinguishable from a married couple, except by their lack of a license. (I would say they lack the lifetime commitment, but so do the married people, too, much of the time.) I say, why can't they have a lifetime commitment without the license while they're at it? Why can't they go by their local church, synagogue, or hippie guru and proclaim their lifetime commitment? Why in the world is it against the law for them to do this? Maybe they don't want the state to bother with them. What about that scenario is so terrible?
The new Zombies Mode will run on the multiplayer engine and therefore support twice the zombies, twice the co-op players and larger maps.Treyarch boss Mark Lamia told us the team’s “really blowing it out on that front”, hinting at unrevealed new modes. “If you like zombies, you’re going to be really happy with what we’re doing with Black Ops 2. It’s our biggest, most ambitious zombies effort ever,” he added to Activision community manager Dan Amrich.
The quickest way to make the batter is to blend the wet ingredients in a food processor first, and then mix the dry ingredients in after that. Serve with a side of smugness and satisfaction.
Finally, he said, "You...uh...look like a fairy tale princess. Because of your hair."
7.- Synthetic - Produced by Mannyphe
So I am not only going to refuse to have anything to do with Elsevier journals from now on, but I am saying so publicly. I am by no means the first person to do this, but the more of us there are, the more socially acceptable it becomes, and that is my main reason for writing this post.
Dave, Brian, Pete and Sid were undoubtedly the worst soldiers their C.O. had ever come across. He doubted they would ever get through their basic training. But Sergeant Rod Black thought differently, he could see something in the four that no one else could.
Or fail to seek forgiveness from those I have wronged,
So my inner economist thought about it for a while and said “Fuck it”.
The fire hydrants long since lost their worth. Stripped of copper fixtures. The train tracks became a challenging landscape for continued skirmishing, the 99% ers trying to continue to eat and stay warm and sleep, letting the single percenters know that the price paid for amassing inexpressible amounts of wealth far beyond satisfying of wants and needs, was a society getting stripped of any decent public amenities, or else plastic would have to again become the scab picket line crosser and offer a fischer price kinda fix for the public’s safety, and because there was no other answer to the movements lately moving, the Occupy movement, the SEIU movement, the Anonymous charge across previously unchallenged firewalls surrounding all the confidential valuable evidence of the true nature of wealth getting wealthy in a country practically on sale to treasury-rich China and other highly intelligent growing shareholders preparing for the USA‘s next bake sale, another private offering, initial, secondary, tertiary…it has got to be done! in the face of economic fragility, real estate discrepancy, silicon valley bubble-forming and pressing on and on, full of hot air at the height of 1999, and liable to repeat itself from here on forward, 2012, just you wait and see, because the stock market is most enjoyed when the single percenters are fucking channeling your 401Ks and 403Bs into inflated, modelled, masked, hotrod web presences who will fly into celestial released confetti drops of cashed in stock options called to earth mere days after IPO‘s hit the tape, despite ongoing efforts to prevent the maelstrom, grassroots bodies en masse to block off the wall street circulation this summer, just to maybe stop some deals from going so smoothly, due to disruptions unanticipated and costly, perhaps.
Duncan Hines' website has pretty good instructions on how to put them together. You can find them here. The best tip, I felt, was microwaving the Oreos a few seconds to soften them so they would separate easier. When I separated them, however, I wasn't entirely successful in keeping all, or even most, of the cream on one side. I used a small off-set spatula to carefully scrape the cream off one side of the cookie and put it on the other side that had the majority of the cream filling. Then, using that spatula (having the small off-set spatula ~ you know, the kind for smoothing frosting on cakes, cupcakes ~ really made this job easy) I smoothed the cream as best as possible.
It seems to me that handheld gaming is reaching something of a cross road. Many are quick to claim that phones are now so powerful and easy to programme for, that they’re the go-to for handheld gaming. Sony and Nintendo obviously don’t believe this as they’ve only just released new handheld consoles.
For the corporate profits of hidden hands.
and nothing else matters
And these have all made
Yesterday, we had a district welcome breakfast that included school mascots, four teachers singing karaoke with cardboard guitars, and two moving documentaries about our school. During those two hours, I was prouder to be a teacher at this school than I have I have ever been proud to be a part of anything. I feel so blessed to be a part of a school that is truly making a difference in students' lives. Making a difference in concrete ways. Making a difference by having a garage sale to earn money to buy two seniors laptops for college. Making a difference by opening the doors to their houses at 10pm to help a student with scholarship essays. Making a difference by demanding excellence because failure is not an option. Making a difference by helping students not just to dream, but to DO. I have some big shoes to fill.
This was a surmountable operational difficulty presented by the linguistic differences between people who were visually indistinguishable. But when we consider the nature of our Muslim Troubles, we see immediately that operating undercover in this fashion is not going to be possible to any significant extent. Nearly all of the Muslims in the UK are something other than white, and nearly everyone in the British army is white. This means that putting together a Det-style army unit to go and prowl around in Muslim areas will be impossible, as there will be no significant pool of suitable people in the army to recruit from for the purpose. It will surely not be beyond the ken of Muslims to see that mysterious white converts to Islam who start coming into their areas may not be exactly what they seem. This is what we will call the mutual impermeability problem, a problem which will bedevil the efforts of all parties to the conflict one way or another. It will be one of the biggest and most significant differences between the Troubles and our forthcoming Muslim Troubles.
I lie in bed, wrapped up in a blanket and surrounded
Piñatas have always been a children’s birthday party staple. Children squeal in delight while holding their goodie bags, waiting for that one big whack of the bat to burst open the piñata and shower them with candy and prizes.
After reading Less Than Zero and American Psycho, I’m a bit of a Bret Easton Ellis fan. I’ve got a couple of his other books that I haven’t read, but I picked up Lunar Park second-hand. I’ll get around to reading his other books on my shelf eventually.
Due to a lack of responses to auditions for our own Juventutem Schola, October's Mass may have to be a Low Mass unless more men come forward to audition. If you are interested please email this address.
And, the atmosphere brings me to the main point as to why we should see more international cricket at Homebush. If we want cricket to grow, it should be accessible to as many people as possible. Last night, there were kids there, probably for their first international cricket match, who would have been locked out by a SCG sellout. The extra capacity of Homebush let’s more people see the game, and it lets more kids have their first experience of the Australian cricket team – and that matters. We can either play more international games at Homebush or have families missing out on really big nights like last night because the SCG is sold out.
Unfortunately, time is something I cannot waste because exam is in a couple months and my preparation has barely begun. So, I recently started a “DON’T BREAK THE CHAIN” system where I set myself to study a minimum of 1 hour a day and each day I’ll cross a day on my calendar. I’m barely studying everyday. Feels like I’m stuck in a vicious cycle, can’t sleep at night because of dissatisfaction of my day and waking up late RESULTING in my own disappointment.
Knitting is a long process, but think about the reaction all your friends will have. Totally worth it. Don’t give up.
The honest answer is; apart from the web, we’re not entirely sure how we’re going to do this yet. This is something traditional publishers do as part of the process for each book and possibly another appealing aspect of traditional publishers. But I’ve also heard they can do very little to push a book, so it’s a tough one to call.
He showed me that He alone wants all of the glory and this is also for our highest good!
Deaths in SA prisons often due to torture by officials:
As for the baking, I am getting by with what I know then I come home and nerd out in a world of endless possibilities that is just at my finger tips, then wake when people are rolling home from last call and try again. I taste and I take in. I ask questions. I CAN'T GET ENOUGH. I love it. I am a baker, a baker in training.
A wise (non-Muslim) friend once told me how her (wealthy and financially astute) father drew her attention to the fact that ‘the highest buildings belonged to insurance companies’, illustrating the highly profitable nature of their business. Their exaggerated profitability stems from the above mentioned odds. Interestingly, insurance companies seem to be virtually single-handedly keeping the South African Broadcasting Corporation afloat through hours-long loops of ‘infomercials’ and at least one advert during every ad break. The insurance industry is just another means through which money is sucked out of the economy in an unproductive way, making less money available for actual consumer goods. So no wonder ‘real ‘ companies probably don’t have budget to advertise on tv.
Concerned.
Ours is the choice--same or different?
On the Friday night, here in lovely Mijas, there was a poetry book presentation at Casa Museo...yes, I know, don't you just love when people tell you... there was!! Sorry, but I did not know about it either until that very afternoon.... we should all read Mijas Semanal much more than we do!
What a send-off Chow gives her! Upon Su's urging...
friend to jail for a year?"
This morning I while eating my breakfast I turned on the TV
You can't see it, but I took a clear Spica Glitter pen and scribbled a little on the edges of the white paper and pink paper, so that it looks like the paper is glittery even though it's plain.
As a runner, I am the same way. When things are going well and I am oh so happy about life, I do not run as fast and I do not push myself. I just jog along in la-la land noticing the flowers and birds chirping. I have trouble pushing myself to run hard and would rather lay in the grass making flower crowns for my head and do some cartwheels while I am at it.
ホランド ノヴァク
Family + Friends: Permission to copy, paste, or use the images above to share with your family and friends.
beginning of UNAMID, an operation
Let’s say your Chapter One begins with your main character getting a root canal. You could show the dentist nattering on and on as dentists tend to do, and that would be realistic, but it could kill your chapter, as in
South Africa's Minister of Health Barbara Hogan said South Africa was not facing a severe cholera crisis, but said the country was dealing with the disease as a matter of urgency, with nearly 200 cases reported so far.
3) I finally went for my weekend run on Dartmoor. It was amazing to run up there, and I only ran into a few sheep. Managed about 2 miles, but next time I need to plan my route a little better and run a circuit, because running, stopping, turning around and running back the way you came is annoying.
then turning the page to see
That doesn’t mean I didn’t drive around 10 minutes longer than necessary being semi-lost. But hey- at least now I know where to go next time…
Battles – White Electric
Follow these instructions to get onto their blog:
Backing up a few weeks ago, Simon and Ava headed to Iowa on Monday, March 21st to visit Omi over Ava's spring break. It was fun for Ava and Simon to have a father daughter road trip to Iowa while also enjoying some quality time with Omi. Here's Ava going down the this cool, old slide at Crapo park that Simon use to play on when he was younger.
I didn't love it, but it was functional. A few weeks back, we had an intern at the brewery who suggested using shower heads like he had seen at another brewery. GREAT idea! And very easy to put into place, plus giving me the opportunity to make it look prettier. Sometimes, even if it works fine, if it's ugly I hate it. I have to look at it all the time. So.... about $20 in parts and now we have a much better, more sightly bottle rinser. Next up, air knife to dry them.
My buzz word is Transition, a word that is used in almost every sentence, something that is moving along at a faced pace and if you was to blink, your being left behind. Transition is the Afghan Security Forces (ANSF) taking control of security from the International Security Assistance Force (ISAF) with which the UK belongs apart of.
There is a profound sense in which music opens a secret door in time and reaches in to the eternal.
In times long past, the first to live upon this place held great ceremonies and offered grand gestures to the Gods in hopes that the Spring would be long and temperate. Without the conveniences of modern man, small changes to a single new season could mean the difference between life and death for an entire people. Today, those small changes went unnoticed, save by a scattering of those whose job it was to log the specifics of each day and bleary-eyed traders pondering the long or short of it. They had been replaced by larger and more important changes such as the palette, collar-cut, skirt length and proper accessories of the season. They were decried by imagination mavens in four-color glossy explosions laid out across town in patterns so diabolical a Nazi minelayer would be jealous, but failed to reach the people as much as an early storm or late thaw in the last millennium. There were a few that had seen both, but they had long since left judgment behind and could not say which was better.
It is Robert Sibley’s view that the world has become disenchanted and that the potential for religious experience has been replaced by a different kind of faith, one he calls scientism. He contends that here is a need for some kind of a sense of the divine. He’s carefully non-specific about which faith he means, but he does make reference to C.S. Lewis’s dictum that one way to acquire faith is to behave as if you have it.
Confidence.
Muslims saw the greatest growth rate among the five main religious groups studied. Their numbers increased by 66.7 percent in the 2010 census from a decade earlier. Latter-day Saints saw the next highest growth at 45.5 percent, followed by evangelical Protestants at only 1.7 percent. The number of Catholics decreased by five percent and the number of mainline Protestants decreased by 12.8 percent.
Roundup: 4 books read, 2 books abandoned. Click the titles below for my full reviews or reading notes. My rating scale is explained here.
In fact, we'll be honest: Not a single person on this editorial board had ever heard of the "expectation of docility and compliance" that is supposedly rampant in the minds of white people. It's almost like the Human Rights Tribunal... made it up.
Why does my blood boil when I hear this crap?
I waited a full two hours after eating before heading out on my run for a few important reasons:
Okay ladies and gentleman as most of you know I would rather be a vegetarian, but this soup was amazing. My husband picked it out since we had a whole fresh cabbage from our garden. How could I say no to his efforts. I hope you enjoy it on a wintery day like today in Florida.
This code works fine but it’s too important a feature to trust to chance. I would generally NOT use javascript in in production because a User can easily disable javascript in their browser then you lose the ability to request another captcha. Lets look at how we could do the same thing using server-side logic.
“I originally wanted to get my MBA and make a lot of money,” Trina says. “But when I saw how much these girls have to offer, and experienced the privilege of watching them heal, there was nothing more enriching to my life than that. It makes me happy every day to work with these girls. They are amazing, and they are going to go out and change the world.”
Now, here's where I need your advice.
This month has been the most laid back month we have had since Rylee has been born. We didn't have any new doctors appointments or any new news. We were told by her nephrologist that after 6 moths free of infection that she is going to do a scan of Rylee's kidneys and see how much damage, if any, was done. Depending on the results of that will determine our next course of action. On the low side we will just keep doing what we are doing and then on the high side she would have to have a transplant. We are just gonna keep praying that she is healthy and that no damage, no sever damage, has been done. So please keep her in your prayers that she remains healthy.
I've been rather busy as I recenlty decided to have another crack at growing chilli plants. I've tried this once before, but had rather a poor result; by poor result, I mean I killed them all.
Ang was eventually made sales director in 2001, and in the following year, he was appointed executive director for ETCM a post he still holds today. Ang also sits on the board of various subsidiaries of the Tan Chong Group.
Then another legend of radio broadcasting in South Africa, Tom London hosts the 10 to 12 slot and will be assisted by our King of the Mix, Freedom “Flex Darkskin” Raphela.
On to this week's It's Okay Friday. It's Okay to:
The selling race produced a further win for the John O’Shea trained Cityar – although no bids even with the low price of £3000. Although with the crowd made up of similar “Christmas Sofa” escapees it was perhaps not the best market place. Look out for the 7 year old gelding in future – it was a worthy winner.
Also recognizing that my job situation is not going to change any time soon. There’s been a firing in our department because of boundary violations. Nothing that would ruin the hospital if it were to get out, but definitely an inappropriate relationship between a patient and a provider, and there were people with information who did not speak up. Not good. And not a good time to talk about a “missing” title. So I’m left thinking: what does this really mean to me in this moment?
* Check the vintage particularly on inexpensive whites and rosés. A 2008 white may not sound that old but if it comes from Australia or Chile it's almost two years from harvest. It may even be a bit elderly for a fresh-tasting European white.
My brother was shocked and not a little hurt that one who had such a messed up face as Phroney did would have the nerve to call his face a mess! It only served to heighten his anxiety about how bad he looked with his acne…
It's Friday and that can mean only one thing, Favourite Things Friday.
What can I say about Ethan at 18 months? He is an adorable, funny, smart, witty, silly, and happy little boy (I can't say baby anymore:( On Thursday (2/23/12) he got ear tubes put in his ears because of chronic ear infections and fluid stuck in his ears which meant his ear drums weren't working correctly. The pictures in this post capture Ethan's attitude and personality as well as the morning. We thought maybe he would be crabby because he couldn't eat until after the surgery, but nope... he was a happy little boy the whole morning
Our friends filled with emptiness, worry, and fear.
You are slumber and respite.
Lacoste – The Global Symbol For All Things Classy in Fashion
Perhaps, writing for a blog is most similar to journalistic writing. Following some basic rules of journalism can work wonders — begin with a hook, start with the most important information and trickle down to the less important, and say only what you need.
No. But I do have slight trepidation when it comes to writing a sequel. I think – well, it’s all fine to pour your imagination into a story and lo and behold, it does well. But to now conform to an expectation that the next one will also be good. Gulp! What if it’s not? What if it’s terrible? So it’s exciting to be in this part of the writer’s journey. It is a long journey and every step so varied. Honing the craft I feel is needed now.
A novel then filled with potent images, difficult questions, complicated motivations and a good dose of anger (just my cup of tea); as challenging to read now as it was when published and a pleasure as ever to do so in this quality edition from Folio. Right, what Coetzee next...?
and yet when I get to that point I find myself going straight.
I was mightily impressed I have to say - it has to have been into one of the top 10 gigs I've ever been to easily. Having seen this lot master the anthemic ballad tunefest I wonder how Coldplay will compare when we see them at Arsenal later this year - frankly this lot were a might tough act for anyone to beat in this genre on last nights performance.
Sautéed Beet Greens With Garlic, Onions and Olive Oil
After breaking free from my somewhat sheltered and slightly ignorant small town country life I started working in a German owned automotive company. This came after I left a management position in a pharmacy chain in my bold attempt to explore new possibilities. It was humbling, because this job I went to was a production job, but they paid for my college. The production job was perfect for me, because there was no stress. I only had to work, which allowed me to save all my brain power for the college classes. The most valuable part of the experience was my introduction to new cultures. Of course Germans had a strong presence there, but many others as well. I made my first black friends there because the small town from which I came was 99.99% white. I made a few new Latin friends from Mexico and South America and a few Asian friends as well.
I even ate Brigadeiro.
Everyday
Thank you Hannah.
A man with dynamite wandered through my caverns and dropped charges deep.
The man who has lived in this house for several years is the grandson of the farmer who built it, and it was passed down three generations to the degenerate who has let the thing go to hell. OK, to be fair, his mother wasn’t much better. When she owned the house, she would decorate the lawn for the seasons and then leave everything up all year—Christmas lights, a plywood cutout of Santa riding a rocket, a hay bale with pumpkins in various stages of decay, plastic Easter eggs hanging from the lower branches of the scraggly trees. Trick-or-treating kids would walk an arc around the place to avoid it on Halloween.
It is with great pleasure that I introduce you to the superstar of vibrators. He’s so fantastic that he’s an icon, truly the Cadillac of sex toys.
the roar of bare feet on a theatre floor
Whether by signing up for a terrorist mission, leaping off a skyscraper, or arbitrarily listening to Justin Bieber, I have no idea. The point is that every two fucking minutes, someone from China is doing the world a favor and if this rate keeps up, overpopulation on the earth will no longer be an issue.
Patent royalties are subject to risk since there is always a chance they can be declared invalid.
may implode.
Add a little vegetable oil in the pan and sauté shallots until they turned golden brown. Add in the cabbage, shallots and spring onions. Stir fry for a short while. Put in the fried flour. Add a little water and salt to taste. Serve with steamed rice.
Better Off Ted – After its first season I declared it the funniest new show in years, then of course ABC goes and brings Modern Family out while NBC delivers Community and makes Parks & Recreations awesome – so now Better Off Ted is just ‘one’ of the funniest new ‘shows’ in years. Still, there isn’t a funnier actress on television than Portia De Rossi playing Veronica.
I grab a hand of bananas and move on to the tomatoes.
As for the reveal of Conrad having someone kill David Clarke in prison – I actually did see that coming. David wasn’t some casual fling for Victoria – he was the big deal and I mean that in the way that Dominik certainly isn’t and given that Conrad resorted to underhanded tactics to get rid of Dominik, having David killed doesn’t seem all that shocking to be honest.
Carl Phillips, Double Shadow
Geeeezus, I can't keep doing this, that much is clear to me now, except that I am basically bound until at least next Monday, which is when we find out if the uhm, yeah, the person who replaced me during my medical leave will be going back (because they kind of promised her a job upon the return of her one-month vacation across some European country or other. Which in hindsight would have been a good idea if she had been a good choice for a replacement in the first place...but why should I care, right? I'm leaving.
Will AMP survive? At the moment, the signs aren't promising, though you never know. For now, authors considering submitting to AMP are well-advised to hold off until the current problems are resolved (if indeed they can be).
Significant signings? Let’s start with the JUCOs. The top-rated junior-college player in the country is now a Tennessee Volunteer. Wide receiver Cordarrelle Patterson is a player of a position that is potentially an embarrassment of riches for the Vols. Patterson is one of four 4-star WRs coming in. Another is the best WR recruit out of Georgia — Jason Croom. Alton “Pig” Howard is another tasty WR signee for at least his name alone. Is Wide Receiver U back? The two other JUCOs are defensive linemen, a position that needs some experience right away. All three of the JUCOs can step in and be expected to contribute immediately.
2. Two Wrongs
An exciting opportunity has arisen for a Spherical Object Progression Executive.
Another corner
As I have been devouring the 2011 remasters there was a strong possibility that this mix was going to be 100% Suede. What a great band; stunning live and some of the best gigs I ever attended. (Especially the show the same day as Ireland had beaten Italy in the World Cup opener, and despite them supporting the shit-awful Cranberries, and my friend Paul getting lost and falling asleep at his local train station. That was quite a day.)
Roberts, Michael 2005a “Tamil Tiger ‘Martyrs’: Regenerating Divine Potency?” Studies in Conflict& Terrorism 28: 493-514.
yay! more bootlegs!! I love 'em! Here we have 3 cassettes by the unfortunately short lived Dutch Oven Classic Horror Soundtracks label. I have a pretty good idea who was behind this label, but I'm not gonna spill the beans.
Obama to mainstream media at last year’s White House Correspondence Dinner: “I am Barack Obama. Most of you covered me. ALL of you voted for me.” And their response was to laugh because it was true and they all knew it was true and it is by now obvious to anyone with more brains than a jellyfish that it’s true. Well, that and the fact that Dear Leader told a funny and all journalists are required to laugh whenever Messiah tells a funny.
I coloured my Seam binding by putting it in a little glass with re-inker, and soaked for awhile, then let dry, and spritzed with shimmer mist, and scrunched it up and let dry ...
Can give his sharpened palate ecstasy
Well, I have been looking for a new job for little over a month now. The changes made to unemployment require me to show proof of at least 5 contacts each week. That said, I did have an interview today and I think it went rather well. I won’t get into too much detail at this time, but I am really hoping to be selected for the position.
Not having a piece of paper, which does limit jobs to some (debatable) extent (though if I chose to, I could study and get a piece of paper, so I'm not sure how much of a downside this is...).
Much love to all, Maltese or not
Between nursing a serious crush on Arrested Development, 234897 barbecues, flying to Columbus and getting my identity stolen, I was accused of something completely and utterly heinous.
And that, finally, really, was that.
Especially when I'm working on my art.
SPM recognizes the value of empowerment during the recovery process and acknowledges the possibility that economic inequities can interfere with a patient’s ability to become empowered. The Journal of Participatory Medicine recently published the article, “Participatory Medicine: Must You Be Rich to Participate?”, expressing fears that the Participatory Medicine movement may be leaving too many people behind.
if i had known this was going to happen i dont know that i wouldve wanted anymore children. does that make me a bad person.
unlike past seasons where the floral detail was on a magnified scale.
Border Punch: American Crafts Knock-Outs Scallop Heart
strategies to prevent, detect,
“Yet again there has been a complete overreaction which in fact will put ordinary people at greater risk than any extremely unlikely external attack,” one letter in the left-leaning Guardian newspaper said.
one week. It will be next Wednesday, December 19th.
I'm afraid, nothing could be further from the truth. Most patients are so desperate to get better from this severely disabling neurological disease that they will try almost anything, including CBT and GET. The trouble is, CBT is at best completely useless, as I found out by doing 12 sessions of CBT and GET is not only very dangerous for people with ME, but many of us have had severe relapses caused by this so-called treatment to the point that many of us, including myself, have been made bedridden 24/7 by GET. Anybody who knows anything about ME knows that GET equals torture for people with ME.
the ghost glitters in the reflecting window glass
We become so used to what is presented as beauty in our culture that it is easy to become confused about God's design for beauty in women. I once read a Christian author who believed that a reasonable amount of time to spend on her appearance was a tithe amount - 10% of her day. That would be at least an hour and a half each day. It seems to me that God has an awful lot of work for us to do in the world that could be done with an extra ten and a half hours per week.
and collaborate to seek for higher understanding.
Sleeping Beauty by The Brothers Grimm
The scariest part of the drive was yet to come … the single lane steep ascent to the retreat. Alpacca’s and horses nodded hello as we zipped past them and then just like magic the rain stopped as we parked outside reception.
So I did and it was one of the most unforgettable experiences I've had. It probably was the first time I learned the body can be quite … what's the word … malleable? And how two kisses can be better than one.
I forgive myself that I’ve accepted and allowed myself to blame the major oil companies and/or the governments for the actions that caused the spill instead of seeing/realizing and understanding that atrocities as this are symptoms of the disease of capitalism within our current money system where life is disregarded in the name of profit.
At my workplace I sit at a desk all day, apart form going to the restroom / kitchen, that's all I do, respond to emails, data entry, respond to emails, data entry, I just have this overwhelming feeling today that I just can't do this any longer .... I need to move, be active and do physical stuff.
The only other thing to say is that this is the 100th post for Whittering On. I've been trying to figure out why I'm not all Woo-Hoo and super-duper excited, running competitions, hosting parties and whatnot but the truth is, it's not my 100th post. I had that last year sometime on my other (now closed to the public) blog and there was fireworks and champagne. Actually this turns out to be my 219th post. So I guess you can see why I haven't got a marching band.
Viewing the index itself, then, we can see that the pieces in the book move from the purely visual and descriptive of natural forms (“1.1.1. Reading a wave“) to a fully speculative meditation on the relationship between the self and the world (“3.3.3. Learning to be dead“). Each intervening story moves a little closer from the external to the internal.
Cheesy Mozzarella Stuffed Meatballs (Makes approximately 32 meatballs)
After all, there's only so much porch-sitting a person can do.
I get so attached to them while I’m writing them that they’re with me all day, even when I’m not putting pen to paper. But after I’m done, I try very hard to move on to the next project. I never go back and read my finished books unless I absolutely have to.
Heat oil in a large 12 inch skillet over medium heat until simmering. Add onion and cook until soft, about 3 minutes. Add garlic and cook until fragrant, about 3o seconds. Drain tomatoes into a 2 cup measuring cup. Add additional water to make 2 full cups of liquid. Add to skillet with 1 tsp salt.
Mei told me these same old book shops we visited had been around since she was a little girl. Every single book, not just the comics, in these shops where old, and I wonder if these comics have been sitting on the shelves in there since they were new. Maybe Mei even picked up these exact books and flipped through them when she was a kid.
How can so many people be so INSANE? Marmite is disgusting! It's been banned in some countries, but that just drives it underground (I myslef, so my shame, have smuggled in pots for friends abroad who've been converted to the stuff, but because I love them, I do it). Governments are waking up to the evil of Marmite, but I don't think it's a war that can ever be one. If only there was a way of recognising Marmite lovers, then it might be easier. You know, we could get them to wear special badges, or round them up and get them to live in certain areas so we could keep an eye on them and make sure they don't spread their vile Marmite love. Surely we have a duty to protect our children from Marmite?
But her saying she will be supporting Boldt is enough to get Stephanie Rice drooling.
The trek through jungles with wild animals, the torrid deserts that have to be traversed with all their dangers, eventually they get horses, gallop up mountains and down into lovely villages filled with music and song… he would have loved to stay there, but they had to carry on, through blinding snow, fighting wolves and the biting, bitter winds.
According to a campaign official, "They want to enlarge their two bedroom home because with five married sons and 16 grandchildren it is inadequate for their needs."
- Anger/ bitterness/ hatred (at people/ God/ themselves).
Another problem for builders of wooden ships was the shortage of timber. Even though John Evelyn had identified increasing shortages of timber as a huge problem in the 1700s replanting had not been sufficient to provide the shipbuilding industry with sufficient supplies.
Someone Saved my Life Tonight
created what you see there.
AYR: Maybe somewhat presumptuous, but worth asking, especially since others have raised the question to me. Still, I'll acknowledge that the Post has kept a reasonably long leash. While it has distributed the Courier-Life produced advertorial Brooklyn Tomorrow, it has published harsh criticisms of the borough presidents like Markowitz, even while its subsidiary does business with Markowitz.
It is customary for tweets referring to Anonymous DDoS attacks to be accompanied by a “Tango Down” hash tag. Originally the term was used by special forces to say that an enemy had been eliminated.
Is a much larger leader of men.
First I printed a full 12 x 12 using the pink circle pattern from Nursery Tails cart. Then using the print only feature I filled the Valentine word collage with red and printed it at 9.5".
If things were not going strange enough, last night, I got hit with malware on the computer. I was searching for some transmission drawings on the internet and hit a site that started trying to scan my computer for errors, trying to sell me data recovery software and showed all kinds of warnings. I could not close it out. I performed a virus scan and a hard drive scan. The scans made it appear that all my files were there, but I could not find anything! Most of the night, the scans ran but this morning it was no better. After returning from the dentist, I had a thought and ran a "System Restore" to a time before the event occurred. Sure enough the computer was restored to the configuration from the previous day. The malware was gone and all my files are back. The only thing missing is my Favorites on my browser. I need to fiqure out if those can be reloaded. I am happy this worked, I thought I was going to have to take the computer somewhere and pay to get it fixed.
Or do you want to embroider masterpieces that you can frame and hang on the wall.
of the unintended consequence.
I could post photo's all night but I won't! :) Some of these photo's were taken by other team members... I was too busy to take pics! Often too busy chatting, laughing or half asleep due to lack of sleep... thanks to my fabulous and adorable roomie Heidi Van Laar... we chatted half of the nights!! :) Good times! Oh, and my batteries died too, that's a good excuse! :)
Our friend's daughter's favourite spot was the playground, which contained many "old-school" relics of play equipment which Scather had not seen since her youth (a lady never reveals her age, but let's just say it was before laws were as restrictive as they currently are as to health and safety). It was actually great - although old, the equipment seemed quite well maintained, and it was excellent to see some of those old styles of activities - giant see-saws (I went on one and was quite freaked out - now that I comprehend danger to a greater extent it is far more exhilarating!) a double slide, those twirly cups you sit in, and a menagerie of bouncy animals.
I love these first two, but not sure the boho/ethnic look will work so well with the adjacent family - in all its mid-century glory. Also, looking more closely at the grays in these fabrics makes the bathroom walls truly look green.
See lookin at it
I have always thought in three dimensions (I can’t draw for toffee and have much admiration for those who can), and having worked on and off with polymer clay for years, I decided to turn my full attention to that medium and see what happened. To say that I was rather surprised by the outpouring of wee creatures which happened as a result is something of an understatement. Now I am completely hooked on polymer clay – it is the most versatile material, and there is no limit to what you can achieve with it. It’s like painting with clay.
I followed a lot of bloggers from blogspot and bloglovin, I read all their post! I mean it..
1 tablespoons Granulated sugar.
Finn's story, involving a very unexpected vampire, living in a very unexpected place! (In which I am writing this very blogpost. I do NOT go out after dark). Why can't he be as famous and successful a rock star as he seems destined to be?
Almighty and supreme God,
Overall I'd say Ano Hana was alright, and I'd give it a 6.5/10.
This is a portable and hearty meal. A perfect meal for little hands too.
So, when we arrived at the wedding, I was not feeling so confident, nor very fragrant or sophisticated. My hair was frizzy, my silk jacket wrapped firmly around me. Every now and again I realised that the neckline had slipped beyond the decent level, and had to give it a quick tug to get it back in place.
Oh yeah, back to the movie, how does all this EPR rambling tie in to the movie? Well, I really wish I had seen it when Eran Kolirin was still here, because I would've loved to quiz him about it. But I can say that festival programmer Rod Armstrong introduced the movie by saying in previous Q&A's some audience members wanted to ascribe mental health issues (anything from depression to schizophrenia) to the protagonist, and Eran was adamant that he's not crazy in any way. Well, that's easy for me--he's not crazy, he's just a physicist. And his class ends one day when he's right in the middle of discussing EPR. So he goes home with all this at the front of his mind, keenly aware he's collapsing Wave Functions all around him. Well, as a guy, what's the one thing that is most profound to collapse by observing. That's right, his own penis. So he takes a second, whips it out, and looks at it in the mirror. Then he notices another guy watching him. And wacky hijinx ensue.
But, then, as I was nearing home, and turning down the driveway, and parking my van, I could feel the hope slipping away from me and I was being drawn down into darkness and hopelessness again.
somewhat causal relationship to the next. (1) Fossil fuels, (2) metals, and (3)
Jenni, the creative genius behind Sparklewren is one of the most - if not the most - talented and innovative corsetieres in the UK today and I am utterly convinced that one day her name will be whispered in the same breath as Mr Pearl in the highest circles of couture - she has already dressed Immodesty Blaize the Queen of British Showgirls.
“You have one hour,” the examiner said, carelessly dropping the test envelope down in front of Anya. “All the sections must be filled out,” he placed a pencil at the top of the desk, “any hint of cheating and your test will end immediately, and you will be prohibited from testing again until next year.” Anya reached for the pencil, but the sharp glare from the examiner made her shrink back into her chair. “The test will begin when I say it does.” He growled, walking towards his desk.
One hundred years ago, 'wireless telegraphy' was mostly used to communicate with vessels crossing the Atlantic Ocean. And these weren't signals with human voices, but rather in the dots and dashes of Morse code. Experiments with sending vocals over the airwaves were already being conducted in New York by Lee De Forest as early as 1907, but radio wouldn't seriously be considered as a means of voice transmittal for almost another decade.
The thing is If we’re all playing the game then surely the oke is sussed enough to come to the conclusion that you’re not actually “busy” and “this old thing” has actually just had the tag removed? Surely when you don’t respond to texts immediately but he’s seen you loitering on Whatsapp (because let’s be honest it says the exact time you were last on) he figures out that you’re not that busy? This “Game” is peculiar and I’m opting out. What happened to the old days where guys would have a massive barny and the best one would win the betty? I like those days.
***it is a breakfast spread
In a separate large bowl, cream together butter, sugar, and brown sugar with an electric mixer on low speed. Mix in the vanilla extract.
In fact, put the sources of any usual conversation abroad. Lets say Spain. Or Cuba. Also, remove any cats, dogs or parrots from the equation.
Two other protesters, Alexander Penley, 41, and Nicholas Thommen, 30, were slapped with several charges including assault, criminal possession of a weapon and inciting a riot.
1 categories
Of course, most practising vampires drain the life from an unblood once in a while, but most make sure they have a careful balance between kills and the safer consumption of vampire blood. After all, in terms of quality the taste of vampire blood is generally more satisfying, more complex and bolder in its flavour than that of a normal, unconverted human being. And the most delicious blood of all, the Pinot Rouge every blood lover knows is the best on offer, is the blood taken from someone’s veins the moment after conversion.
Mom: AWWWWW
Pila could provide us with the blueprint on how to salvage what’s left of our old towns without needing big money. When conservation is the discussion, individuals and groups always talk about money – but I feel that attitude is as important as funding. The people must be taught of the importance of why there’s a need to conserve. Although the church and plaza had received several donations from known politicians, the houses were largely maintained by descendants.
3) Schlitz
Each year bar associations, courts, and various educational entities plan events and programs for Law Day. The American Bar Association selects a theme for the events annually. This year the theme is No Courts, No Justice, No Freedom. The ABA also publishes a Planning Guide with content for lesson plans and classroom programs, as well as suggestions of publicizing Law Day events in local communities.
All Taib needs is another cabinet reshuffle, then Awang Tengah can override Jabu , Mawan and Masing because he is no more dependent on Pesaka, SPDP and PRS .
But in the intervening years, no one asked for another test that could have identified another suspect. In 1992, there wasn’t a DNA databank, so the information couldn’t be entered and produce a “cold hit” as it eventually did in this case.
not necessarily, you see I find "Nice" very nice, for a while..
Dear Lisa and Kathy:
I passed it by half-a-dozen times before my curiosity got the better of me and I decided to give it a chance. As much as I’ve been addicted to Murder She Wrote, I really wasn’t expecting much from A Green Journey—But I was in a Hallmark/Lifetime-movie-of-the-week kind of mood, so it was well-suited.
* You’ve toured both the UK and the US with Devil’s Kiss and now DARK GODDESS. How have your readers reacted to your books? And how has it felt to be able to interact with them? How have male readers responded to reading a book with a girl as the main character?
“I’ll wait for you by the lift” she said then turned hoping her previous thoughts hadn’t left a damp patch on her skirt.
● Gag Reel
Lola chooses stories the baby will like.
"I told you I could take care of it," Abby said as her swords disappeared.
Master and I had our celebration yesterday. I am back to my goal weight, and have really been working at getting back to an exercise routine. We, of course, started off with some naked kneeling, and He was "enjoying" my breast...He commented that I was not squirming...I replied...with just a bit of sarcasm..oh Master, it feels so good...He chuckled and said then I should thank Him.
Now that Wynn has realized the down side of Obama for himself and his company and has decided to speak out, maybe other businessmen will too.
to buildings with character, those rooted in America and that could chronicle many tales. Abandoned two-story farm homes, old weathered barns, covered bridges, and this station I frequented, all fill me with wonderment and have been the subject matter for many of my drawings and paintings. I love the simplicity of line in this rendering, the solitude, and of course its historic value, and this was an attempt at preserving my memories of it on canvas.
Soon after, the gnomes started appearing.
Strong scenes structure is the favored model in the current publishing industry. This will be a fun and rewarding class. And tough. We’ll examine the micro and macro issues that make up great scenes, and we'll discuss books as well as movies for inspiration. You'll learn from an editor's perspective how to restructure scenes to make them more dynamic for the reader. Learn how to edit your scenes for tighter language, engaging action, compelling dialogue, and character development your readers will love. You’ll get an editor's perspective on issues of language, structure, and content.
Level 16: MP Cost: 45, Duration: 160 seconds, 67% chance to not get knocked back.
Sometimes I have a vision of the very last scene, and I write to find out how the characters got to that point. Other times I have a character and an opening, and I write to find out what happens next. The story starts to unfold and, with luck, layer.
Paper: My Minds Eye offcut
Please join me below:
May we faithfully remember that the purpose of our education is skill in knowing and applying the works of God in wisdom to one’s unique situation.
In With the New
To be fair, however, the monument does make more sense if one understands and sees it in context. Although still photos tend to depict only the controversial portrait sculpture itself, it is in fact part of a much larger complex, truly “monumental” in proportion and with a logic and even narrative or movement of its own.
DW: Unbelievable!
6/5 - Gaslight (1944)
Considering how much pet insurance has improved over the last 15 years or so, you’ll probably be surprised at how much you can save. Annual exams, booster shots, dental cleanings, spay/neuter and a whole lot more are covered.
We then cruised back to the pier, had a spot of lunch and took the bus back to Ha Noi. We all really enjoyed our time on Ha Long Bay in the Chinese Junk Boat, but the scenery wasn’t really new to us after seeing southern Thailand and the more sparse islands around there, so it would have probably been more impressive if we had been here first. Saying that it was very pretty and would definitely recommend seeing it, but if you had to choose between the two I would say Krabi was nicer!
Venue: 184 Stoke Newington Church Street, London N16, 0JS
T asting the essence of the loved one
Reading so many others blogs I've noticed the things I don't do on my blog:) I'm not going to change how I blog but it just got me thinking. I have to admit that I felt a kinda way about my post, because almost everyone else's seemed so put together and thoughtful. And, well mine is somewhat of a diary in a sense. I blog because I want to have a journal my kids can look back on when they get older, or God forbid something happen to me I want something for my family to look back on and see where some of my thoughts were. Because, of that I don't blog to much about particular personal issues, and I don't "air my laundry" on here. I do try my best to keep it honest, but I do omit some personal details about our life.
Qualcomm, +84%
If you'd like to see some reviews and pretty pictures of the new Heartbreaker collection, WeHeartThis has got you covered! I was lucky enough to receive the new Smashbox Heartbreaker eau de parfum (in case you weren't aware, I am a product tester for weheartthis) and my review for this new perfume is in the comments if you'd like to see my take on it (spoiler: it's *amazing*). Just click on the logo below:
Now that school is back in session, niece Emma is spending her days with us again. She arrives about 7:30, well before Frank and Chloe wake up, so she and I spend the mornings chatting, just we two. These conversations are sometimes, oh, mundane I suppose: what we did last night, what we're thinking about doing today.
3. Closed captioning of a Teletubbies episode
My grandmother died of breast cancer before she was 50 years old. I was very young when she died and barely remember her. I did not want that for my baby girl or my two boys. I am so grateful for the medical technology that is currently available to give me the peace of mind to know that all is well.
Something about wandering through them
And as it turns out, they make for one mind-blowingly delicious soup.
Whether or not you BAR attorneys swore a secret oath to administer the
It was a beautiful, light filled space. Not as overdone as many others. 20 minutes was sufficient time to admire the artwork.
Oxford in Faulkner’s day was a quaint stop in the North Mississippi hill country on the Illinois Central Railroad line. Mainly, the Oxford stop was to move cotton and students around. A relatively new town by Eastern standards, Oxford as a white settlement goes back only to 1836, when Lafayette County was one of thirteen counties created by the state legislature. But before that, the area had been home to the Chickasaw and earlier groups for around twelve thousand years. In 1837, three men purchased fifty acres for a town from two Chickasaws, Hoka and E Ah Nah Yea, who no doubt saw the writing on the wall: The site was on the Trail of Tears, along which a year later Native Americans would be forced to leave their home and march westward.
What is like a Scavenger Hunt? My weekly visit to my local Farmers’ Market starts off with my list in hand, ready to gather fresh produce and baked goodies to bring home to enjoy. As soon as I reach my destination, my excitement builds, my eyes dance around from the assembled tables of each vendor, and I forget the items on my list and buy with my eyes! Knowing the produce I select has not traveled far from the very ground it grew in, makes my choice of vegetables even more special.
A Boeing 747-400 passenger jet can hold 416 passengers. This blog was viewed about 2,000 times in 2010. That’s about 5 full 747s.
Also, it was my birthday this month so hubby took me to Sun Moon Lake here in Taiwan to celebrate. It was startlingly beautiful so I wanted to share a few pics here with you...
** Update:
Loooong before haute couture in fashion there was you.
We are moving to a new home! Blogger is trying to make us use HTML to edit everything on our blog now and we lost a lot of links to our friends blogs. Please come visit us at our new home at www.chrisandamandswonderyears.wordpress.com. If you want us to link to your blog, then please comment for us here or there leaving a web adress for your blog.
The first EP, The Serpentine Similar (Dexter's Cigar, 1993), with the collaboration of John McEntire, is a deeply experimental record. Apart from a few scant touches by McEntire on percussion, the tracks are arranged for guitar and bass only or for piano and bass (in rare exceptions voice too). What sets this music apart isn't so much its bare arrangements, but rather the ambiguous incongruities in its harmony.
When chapman billies (Fellows) leave the street,
Quality is of such importance to Connor that he has page on the Bier Brewery website dedicated to his promise to produce quality beers. And he says he will not sell an inferior product. To prove his point, he tweeted yesterday that he had dumped batch #40 down the drain for not meeting quality expectations.
The second time I got "that feeling" was when Joan and Gail talked about the way things are heading in education today. A push for core standards, mandates, interventions, and "teaching with fidelity." It is absolutely essential that we stand up for what we know to be right for children. I must stand firm in my beliefs and continue to learn about what I can do to improve the literacy lives of my students. I actually had a chance to talk to Ellin Oliver Keene (author of Mosaic of Thought) this week, too. She encouraged me to continue to "fight the good fight." She also told me that it is quite often the best teachers who are in the most trouble. That is ME to a T! :) I will continue to embrace new thinking and new learning, as I push away instruction that doesn't fit with my beliefs.
Top rolls with chicken mixture and blue cheese crumbles.
I had heard that Beads of Courage had found a supplier for their butterfly beads, which is true. However, I have found, through dialogues on Lampwork Etc., that when artisan butterfly beads are available, Beads of Courage does want to use and will use the artusan made beads, too. After learning this, I began to make butterflies again. Here's a sample of what I will be sending in with my next box of beads to Beads of Courage.
Since he was far too young to purchase a gigantic car to compensate for his minuscule genitals, it was unfortunate for everyone that Dickwad the III sought out to justify his dominion when he crowned himself king of the slide, see-saw and swing set. Woe unto me when I invaded "his" territory.
In the face of that existential quandary, there's only one decision to make - the same one that I always make while standing at the open fridge.
The Philippine Tarsier Foundation runs the Philippine Tarsier and Wildlife Sanctuary in the forest of Corella, Bohol, where tarsiers roam freely.
Well, that’s one way to look at it. However, I know half a dozen conservative Catholic theologians who would argue with Dan’s take on who was doing what with the Mystical Body. You could start with simony, the corrupt (oops) mendicant friars, the degradation of the monasteries, the political infighting and sexual incest among the heirs to the Papal Crown – all the behaviors that repelled the average Johann in the pew.
and then she added the patterns to her legs by her sides!
So if you've emailed work or a query, and not yet heard back, don't panic. I'll get round to everyone in the end. Though once it's more than 4-6 weeks, feel free to nudge me, in case your email went astray.
12:30: Lunchtime and another amazing session with Richard finishing with a trance. Feel so alive and positive but slightly anxious about tomorrow’s phobia day – I hate spiders and moths so if he can get me over that it would be incredible!
-create 11 new questions for the people you tag.
At least beets and radishes are what I think those fuzzy little beasts were I found nuzzling the baby carrots. Thank science for cellophane. In another day or two, we might have unleashed a mutant root vegetable upon the world or, worse, another Republican candidate for president.
You may reserve blocks at multiple hotels -- based on price points and style. You can choose both a budget-friendly and high-end option to allow guests to choose the hotel they want.
They had driven in wild convoys down from Tyre and began to pull the blankets off the mutilated corpses of their mothers and sons and daughters and to shriek "Allahu Akbar" (God is Great") and to threaten the UN troops.
$50 at sign up and $50 the day of retreat :)
Released reports suggest the fire began near a temporary generator that was being used due to problems with the building's main power supply. Hey, they're monks not electricians. However, after the BBC Europe botch job we weren't entirely satisfied with the reported cause of the fire... so we conducted our own investigation. What we found was far more sinister than a Honda generator.
4. New well is being dug as we speak. We are hoping to hit water soon!
Also the ability to showcase beer in stemmed glassware & to rival wine & appeal to a wider market including the huge potential of attracting more female beer drinkers into the market she not be underestimated.
I also had the rather deranged delusion that I'd have plenty of time to make a quick fly-by in-and-out visit to all of the participating blogs.
I go away for a month and look what happens?
Below are some snapshots taken of the children in the classroom during the month of February:
I don’t expect anything in return.
Among those in attendance were U.S. Senators Richard Lugar, Robert Casey, Frank Lautenberg, Jeff Ningaman, Roger Wicker, Mark Warner, Kay Hagen, and fifty-three members of the U.S. House of Representatives.
Why can't Norwegian cooks LEAVE SHIT ALONE. Just like they have food traditions here that no one messes with, bagels have their own traditions too and Everything bagels with jalapenos is just RIGHT OUT. It's bad enough they add parsley to the salsa, corn to the nachos and spinach to the tortillas....leave the damned bagels alone!
The best analysis, of Marx and Engels position, is that given by Roman Rosdolsky. Rosdolsky had been a leader of the Ukrainian Communist Party, in the 1920’s. In the 1930’s, he was one of the leaders that opposed Stalin’s invasion of the Ukraine.
Secondary characters should not take over a scene unless there’s a very good reason. They are there to support the main characters or add color to the story, not to be the main reason for the story. If they start to take over, then maybe you’re telling the story from the wrong point of view.
Over the past decade a host of books have been published on the differences between the generations of workers, with labels like Baby Boomers, Gen X, Gen Y, Millennials and so on. As you read books like The 2020 Workplace, Bridging the Boomer-Xer Gap, Generations at Work and similar titles, the authors use the differences between the generations to talk about their skills and weaknesses as groups, and how to take advantage of the skills and overcome the weaknesses.
Everyday we are bombarded with images of beautiful woman and if you like me, it’s hard not to compare yourself. Don’t we all want to be as beautiful as the women on the magazines? According to Jezebel, a nonprofit has found that U.S. women spend $7 billion a year on cosmetics and beauty products: An average of about $100 a month each and I know there have been a few months when I’ve hit that $100 mark. Why do we spend so much? Well many of us, myself included, may have unrealistic expectations. We buy products hoping for results that aren’t possible in an effort to look like people who don’t even look like themselves! Check out the photos below and you will see the transformations a face can go through because of anything from makeup to plastic surgery.
Note that ingredient's list is VERY loose as to quantities. It's not something you can strictly follow
“It’s nice in here,”
Sorvino does nothing but flirt with Nicole, presented in such detail that the film practically becomes a romantic comedy for a short period. Because that’s really what I wanted in a movie called The Stuff; a fat balding middle aged man hitting on a woman. Truly they picked the right focus for this picture. Oh and there’s a few minor parts in there about The Stuff coming to life and killing people…but that doesn’t matter too much…
American History Homework Survival Guide - Grades 4-6 (Kantor)
dried herbes de Provence and/or 1 large bay leaf
2 offspring
Sheltering under my arm.
We have been in full prep mode for Pooh Bear. I had my second shower last Saturday thrown by my sweet friends at work, where I haven't actually worked since February, and we received so many thoughtful gifts. They are a group of incredibly kind and generous ladies and it was so great seeing everyone and celebrating the upcoming arrival of our girl!
Needless to say, friends, the dream rattled me. It's played in my head at least twice this month, and each time, I've jolted awake with a feeling of panic. I've never blamed myself for my father's death. In fact, no one in my family has ever blamed themselves -- something I've always been so thankful for since playing the blame game is all too common when a loved one commits suicide. But each time I woke up, I felt the sting of those feelings...
Rich
That’s all rather vague, so let me put it better. I’m a shy person, and I also know what anxiety feels like. I do have an anxiety disorder (generalized, if you were curious), but it has nothing to do with my shyness. My shyness is this: I don’t like meeting new people, I don’t like talking in front of groups, but I also don’t have Social Anxiety Disorder. I get nervous, but I don’t really avoid those situations, and I can overcome that nervousness. It can be unpleasant talking to new people or in front of groups, but it can also go well.
Vocabulary/Spelling -- 20 minutes
Grind the soaked grains with curry leaves.
supporting the durham rescue mission.
"Sobran fell against a warm, firm pillow of muscle. He lay braced by a wing, pure sinew and bone under a cushion of feathers, complicated and accommodating against his side, hip, legs, the pinions split around his ankle. The angel was breathing steadily, and smelled of snow. Sobran's terror was so great that he was calm, a serenity like that a missionary priest had reported having felt when he found himself briefly in the jaws of a lion. There was an interval of warm silence; then Sobran saw that the moon was higher and felt that his pulse and the angel's were walking apace."
On Nuclear issue too, how can the US and other “nuclear” nations preach nuclear abstinence to Iran when they themselves are armed to teeth with nuclear warheads, with a combined capacity to destroy the complete world at least 15 times over? (Well, one can die only once, sadly!) What legitimacy does all these nuclear nations have which gives them the moral-or-immoral authority to curb an independent nation’s nuclear ambitions when it is repeatedly proclaiming its peaceful intents? Even if the fact that Iran fought with Iraq for almost a decade but that does not make it a global threat! And by the way, we all know that both these neighboring countries were pitched against each other to neutralize each other and create a conflict zone in the Middle East to suit global arms dealers’ desires. Both Iran and Iraq got used and abused by the West, including the US. The intention was only one: to gain forever access to their huge Oil reserves in order to satiate their ever growing energy demands. Saudi Arabia, the world knew, was never going to be easy to target, anyway, and that is the reason it has never been eyed so far in spite of being the largest Oil producer.
That's the best thing, for a teacher - to know that something passed on has made a difference. Good stuff, innit! So here's a second pint...
#9 Mephisto- Hardcore favorite
76. Seen the Changing of the Guards in London
Hence the blog in January 2010. My main goal was to find a new creative passion. I wasn't planning on quitting my job. I wasn't planning on traveling the world. I was just hoping to find some pleasure in my life.
"Sacrifice is a story that's very close to my heart. For one, it's set in Japan and that's always special. Also, I really let myself go on this one. I took some risks I wouldn't have taken before, and I pretty much hung all my hopes on The Red Penny Papers. The subject matter isn't for everyone, and I needed to submit it to someone who would get it. Even then the story could have sucked, so you can imagine how excited I was when it got accepted. So if you like your horror mixed with love and gender issues, check out "Sacrifice." Or hell, if you just like Japan!
Don't get me wrong, I want him to grow and do all the things a little boy should, but not too quickly. He's already in 3-6 months clothes and it seems like just yesterday I was being admitted into L&D. And that's a story if there ever was one.
-ijust lay there shaking; surrounded in blood. I’d been stabbed in my side and punched in the face. I was fighting for breath, knowing my life was coming to an end.
It is still not totally finished but it is up and running.
(making things is not just for professionals named Martha in Connecticut or skinny people in Brooklyn who wear black - this is not about making something perfect or something amazing or something that says anything other than I made this)
In the last several years there have been numerous articles that continually show that active managers by and large under perform the index. Going beyond this, the conclusion is that investors should buy a passive index or broad based ETF and earn the returns of the index.
6. April showers bring May flowers...do you have a green thumb?
This pattern continues throughout the book. At the top of every page is "Boozhoo, (name of the child in the photo)" Below each photo is a line of text.
Liebster is a German word, meaning dearest or beloved, but it can also mean favorite. The idea behind the Liebster Blog Award is that it is given to talented and/or loved bloggers who have less than 200 followers in order to create new connections and to bring attention to these wonderful blogs!
Return the dry ingredients and water to the original mason jar that contained the alcohol, seal, and leave for seven days, shaking vigorously once a day.
19. Stu Bangas - Relay
* If you'd like to receive updates from this blog directly into your Facebook news feed, you could *like* its Facebook page.
Jury selection started Monday in the trial of an Orlando woman charged with killing her 2-year-old daughter.
In his definitive work, The Decline And Fall Of The Roman Empire, Edward Gibbon listed the five causes of the fall of Rome.
Tied on the Umpqua C400 jig hook and with a tungsten slotted bead, the Jigged Prince has become a serious go to pattern for many of our guide team this spring. And we are expecting big things to come from its colleagues, the Jigged Pheasant Tail and Hare’s Ear, and Bugger variant the Thingamajig.
And you can go on your adoration tour, but you can’t find the time to make a public statement about your unbelievably disgusting comment mocking God’s special souls and their loving families?
She is currently appearing in Alan Ayckbourn's Season's Greetings at the National Theatre and was last in the West End in David Eldridge's Under the Blue Sky.
Reading a book about crimes in Chicago.
Women – watch Darna for the love story.
So I wasn't surprised when I got up early that Sunday morning to drive home that there was fog. Fog is a part of living in the valley ... especially when the temperatures warm up during the day and get down into freezing temperatures at night. The fog, known as tule fog, can be so thick that there can be zero visibility. They even close the schools on those thick fog days.
If happiness is our primary goal, we’ll get a divorce as soon as happiness seems to wane. If receiving love is our primary goal, we’ll dump our spouse as soon as they seem to be less attentive. But if we marry for the glory of God, to model His love and commitment to our children, and to reveal His witness to the world, divorce makes no sense.
Up! craft ‘White’, ‘Pale Plum’, ‘Sage Shadow’, ‘Apricot Appeal’, ‘Almost Amethyst’, ‘Barely Banana’; StazOn ‘Timber Brown’; Distress Ink ‘Wild Honey’, ‘Frayed Burlap’; Perfect Pearls Mist ‘Heirloom Gold’
Since the 1980s the Greens have been telling everyone that carbon dioxide was causing global warming—now called climate change—and warning that CO2 emissions were going to kill everyone in the world if they weren’t dramatically reduced. The ball was put in motion with the United Nations 1997 Kyoto Protocols when many nations agreed to this absurd idea and carried forward by the United Nations Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change ever since.
For those following along at home, the baby boys were induced at 3.00pm on the 17th of June, which is coincidentally my Mum's birthday, and arrived at 10.20pm and 10.36pm that same day. Let's just say that a twin delivery is a production with quite a few cast members, certainly a lot more than showed up for Isaac's delivery. I can absolutely guarantee that it will be a one time only show, because as cute as they are, they are hard work! So it has been a bit foggy around here the past six months. I have baked, but my mental capacity and time scarcity have not stretched to anything really ground breakingly new. So in absence of cake photos, here are some baby photos instead.
What is even startling, as reported, is that bricks and other essential construction materials are being purchased from old houses in the vicinity so that the construction works would look older and archaeologically authentic.
ME HAPPY :)
FROM "STICKS AND STONES WILL BREAK MY BONES"
6. Dominique
Except Joshua. Joshua is just someone else entirely. I love his character. I love how he brings warmth wherever he goes, how he cares for Amelia and how he is such a good good good character. Though, I don't really like his name but that's not really an issue.
This past Monday, April 2nd Nate's sweet Grandmother Carolyn passed away. She was 79 years old and we are all so blessed to have had her in our lives and to have been loved by her. The good-byes at the hospital were heartbreaking, death is always so hard for those of us who are left behind but there was peace, she was reuniting with her Love and returning home.
Get you, get you, get you,
Most recent update (31.VIII.2008) of the List of Literature on Reproduction, Pregnancy and Work
stages, it was not only an
There's something about blowing bubbles that just gets everyone in a good mood :)
Birthday Sessions
I’m letting myself go again, I can sense it, and the taste of takeaway food follows me like a newly purchased kitten. Pizza, wine and dope fill the air and scatter across the living room floor like dry ice settling on some northern moor in a shockingly bad horror film. And that really pains me - as I'm a clean bloke!
SMS (Text Messaging)
and woman in veils walking paces behind
linda portman
Despite the refusals, cold stares and silence
in the day of battle;
Edit and added - I am really sorry - everyone who has left lovely comments, including Nuala herself, will see they aren't here. Maybe because I set up the post to be published automatically, Blogger is deleting anything new... many apologies. Thank you for your messages, and to Nuala - she had thanked people, and its all got blanked!
daunting task, more impressive in the fact that they not only did so, but
green multi-faceted bead
8. Spring Break ski and camping trips!
yellow wrist band, FFFF
Muse: What was it like growing up a prince among kittens?
Teaching
I’m over it now, I think. After four days of this newness, I’m feeling calmer. Of course the first thing I did, after shakily receiving J.’s reassurances that “If anyone can do this, you can,” was hit the grocery store near my office on lunch break so I could stock up on a handful of items to make the first week easier. Almond milk – check. Gluten-free pancake mix, for emergencies – check. Organic popcorn crisps for a school snack – check. And, to be completely honest, a box of Rice Chex cereal. No, ordinarily, I don’t buy boxed cereals for the boys. And I’m not sure how proud I am of the purchase. But I knew L. was familiar with Chex from school and elsewhere, and it made me feel better to pick up something that would seem sort of normal to him while I was feeling food-haywire.
A recent online survey asked customers if they would pay more for services that were seamless and had a single source of care coordination. About 80% stated yes they would pay more for making it easier. Would you?
And so tonight,
But I finished the night strong, and made it back to the car just fine.
“Marvel’s The Avengers” is presented by Marvel Studios in association with Paramount Pictures. The film is being produced by Marvel Studios’ President Kevin Feige and executive produced by Alan Fine, Stan Lee, Jon Favreau, Louis D’Esposito, Patricia Whitcher, Victoria Alonso and Jeremy Latcham. The film will be released May 4, 2012. The film is distributed by Walt Disney Studios Motion Pictures.
In conclusion, it’s interesting to watch these self-publishers go commercial. I don’t think any of them have succeeded as much as they did with self-publishing; it’s probably because a) the process was rushed and somewhat ignored because the books already have found its audience and should therefore go on the market ASAP and b) these authors just weren’t built for commercial publication. Their books weren’t, either, which is probably why they didn’t go that route (for whatever reason) in the first place.
I had my doubts.
Husband: Gerald Cline (m. 1953, div. 1957)
I guess I love this black and white pattern because I found these two images of fabric I had saved that I was considering for recovering my wingback chairs. It looks almost identical to the blouse pattern. The fabric is Ground Works Confetti by Lee Jofa.
The food was amazing and we were all so hungry after all those trips up and down the stairs, hauling boxes, etc. I went home and slept for 15 hours!
* I wonder if you’re
O.k, back to work for me.
Something stirred within him. Shouts and chatter rang in his ears, palms sweating and fingers twitching in nervousness. The white walls surrounding him didn’t do much for his paranoia either. Gislenus couldn’t stand it, but he had to. Somewhere, the clock ticked out a monotone song. He didn’t bother looking at the time, by the way the professor looked around, he knew the bell was going to ring in any minute. Then, he’d be able to go and fix any problem his family had that day. Sure, they’d yell and scream at him, but he’d get the job done one way or another.
The age of physical ability to have a child, which is why your menstrual cycle starts, is very different than the age of your soul’s maturity level to decide whether you are in a healthy or unhealthy relationship and to determine if you are being manipulated by someone who you believe is looking out for your best interest.
I think I'll try making the pumpkin cheesecake again for Christmas this year, and this time I'm going to just follow the recipe!
PS I’ll be doing a poetry reading Tuesday May 8 at the Artists Union Gallery at 730pm; an open mic follows my feature. Here’s more about my poem and broadside which was first published in ArtLife Limited Editions.
For the challenge this time we have, not one,
For October's food group, I thought it appropriate that our ingredient be pumpkin. Each of the girls in the group brought a different (or a few different) pumpkin dish(es). It was a delicious meal and a fun excuse to get together and chat.
PLOT: Spock really needs to get lai- married to his betrothed, but she tricks him into fighting Kirk to the death.
“In 1995, neurotoxicologist and former Director of toxicology at Forsyth Dental Center in Boston, Dr. Phyllis Mullenix published research showing that fluoride built up in the brains of animals when exposed to moderate levels. Damage to the brain occured and the behavior patterns of the animals was adversely effected. Offspring of pregnant animals receiving relatively low doses of fluoride showed permanent effects to the brain which were seen as hyperactivity (ADD-like symptoms). Young animals and adult animals given fluoride experienced the opposite effect — hypoactivity or sluggishness. The toxic effects of fluoride on the central nervous system was subsequently confirmed by previously-classified government research. Two new epidemiological studies which tend to confirm fluoride’s neurotoxic effects on the brain have shown that children exposed to higher levels of fluoride had lower IQs.”
Treble Clef flatware by Gourmet Settings
Maki takes a job at a small company that gives tourists hour-long joy rides on a Cessna. It’s not like piloting fighter jets. But the steady hours mean he gets more time to be near his son. On his first day a strange woman in black, Sara, signs up for a ride and holds Maki at gunpoint, ordering him to fly far off his usual course. The mysterious hijacker takes him to a secret military base where Maki is quarantined in a huge concrete reinforced bunker. His demands to know why are met with stoic silence. Finally, once Maki is securely locked into the bunker’s basement under guard and unable to escape, he is told the answer.
Polymer clay ruining your polish? Use the quick dry polishes or the gel coatings in the nail salon.
The doe was floundering. He knew it to be so. It had started to stumble and veer wildly. His horse floundered also, but he wasn’t about to let it give up now. They were approaching a break in the trees. That would be his chance – leaping from his horse he would draw an arrow and nail this bitch. Victory would be his and he would feast upon the uncooked innards of his prey. The doe broke cover followed almost immediate by Fuckington. He leapt from the horse, reaching for an arrow and readying his bow as he landed on the ground.
Viva Riva (Munga)
Yes, that album had plenty of fine, old-style country and traditional bluegrass playing — which I loved. But it also rocked at times, and I loved that too.
hurt the economy
What is your favorite lesson? I have lots of favorites, but I must say I enjoy Lesson 7 about going to the grocery store with your child/goat. Ha!!!!
Aggro - aggressiveness.
with tap water soaking the Korean Glass Noodle.
the sentence of many if transportation had not been introduced.
These are just a select few of the many amazing speakers Now Training highly recommends; to discuss your specific requirements or to find out more call Tony Meyer on 01920 460211 or email: tonym@nowtraining.co.uk
It’s a long shot, but I Believe. And that goes for the Senators, too.
2 carrots, peeled and cut into batons, blanched and refreshed
Regalbuto
Feel free to flip, rotate, re-size and add embellishments, as long as we can clearly tell you have followed the sketch.
Apparently there is no need to discover if allegations are true nowadays. Just the fact that someone has been accused by anonymous sources is enough to convict - at least in the press. So much for innocent until proven guilty. Proof of a settlement is no proof at all, particularly when it comes to sexual harassment allegations. It is routine for large companies to pay off on claims like this as it is far cheaper (even at $45,000) than investigating and defending a suit. Ultimately, a southern man - particularly of a certain age - calling someone 'darling' is as much sexual harassment as Brigadier General Michael Walsh's calling Senator Barbara Boxer 'ma'am' was an attempt to somehow demean her. Ridiculous.
Over and out! x
Things have picked up b/c I have an appointment to pick up a ready-made kegerator (7 cubic feet) on Tuesday. I will use this one to drink the IPA I brewed (that has been sitting in the keg forever). Once my bigger kegerator is constructed, I will use this smaller one to ferment, maybe lager, and to bring out to the football tailgates. Negros won't know WHAT to do when we have a live ass kegerator at the Univ of Houston and Houston Texans tailgates, as opposed to a keg sitting in an ice bucket with an air pump, or just drinking beer out of bottles like heathens. Speaking of which, if anyone has any recommendations for tailgating beers, please send them along. One more day. Holla.
Tip: I don’t think Stoke will win by more than a goal, but definitely take them to win. Stoke to win by one goal is 5/2 in PP. If you feel confident/greedy then you can take them to win by at least one goal at 13/5 in the same bookmaker. I expect one of these to land cash.
Reminds me of one of the quotes from Steve Job's 2005 commencement address at Stanford, excerpts of which are being aired everywhere right now:
We’re wrapping up our book club on L.L. Barkat’s Rumors of Water over at TweetSpeak Poetry today. Stop over and for the story of this poem and to join the discussion.
As to the names issue, the North tended to call battles and armies after bodies of water, and the South would pick the nearest town or other man-made feature in selecting names, so Manassas Junction was what they called the battle of Bull Run after, and this trend then continued on with many other battles. Fredericksburg is called the same by both north and south.
This lets me have some fun 'cause all my flannels are from when I planned on cloth diapering Sunshine with some AIOs (all in ones are like washable disposable diapers with velcro tabs). We ended up using EC (Elimination Communication ) and didn't need any extra diapers so...I've a LOT of flannel. Since I'm gender neutral I picked out all the fabric I found cute. There's Bad to the Bone, Unicorns, little toadstools, Frogs, Knights with Castles, motorcycles, space, a Supergirl...just lots. I take silky ribbons that I keep every year and after 'wrapping' it like you would with paper I wrap it with the ribbon. Sometimes I'll pull it up and have this poof of fabric with a big bow. That looks nice for the solid colors. I'll take some pictures of ours to share with ya'll and hopefully you can use the idea next year. Remember...after Christmas sells!
James Squire Brewing
For instance, we learn that in the sixteenth century Conrad Dasypodius, a Swiss mathematician, could have chosen to restore the old Clock of the Three Kings in Strasbourg Cathedral. Dasypodius, however, preferred to build a new clock of his own rather than maintain an old one. Over two centuries later, Jean-Baptiste Schwilgue was asked to repair the clock built by Dasypodius, but he decided to build a new and better clock which would last for 10,000 years.
But you will notice that Jesus’ resurrection body carries the scars of his crucifixion. As we all carry scars, I’m sure. Life becomes ever more complex and perplexing, to borrow two words from our Lent book. We end up with scars. These scars don’t evaporate, even in the light of the resurrection. But perhaps they do have their uses. Macabre as is sounds, they helped Thomas, and Jesus offered him exactly what he wanted – to put his hand in his nail marks and in his side. Perhaps, believing in the resurrection, even our scars become part of our sending.
Of connection, come now with new protection, keep me color Orange and safe, let
#5 Kuerig coffee maker. I've saved so much money, time and energy by making coffee at home. I received this from my parents as a birthday gift this past February and I cannot explain my love and delight with this product. It's fast, so good and just makes life easier. Tommy doesn't drink coffee so the single serving K-Cups are great. I thought it would help me to drink less coffee but man was I wrong. So terribly wrong. I'm okay with my coffee consumption though.
Having two babies, naturally I have a lot of time to hone my diaper changing skills.
She has been so “attitudey” lately too. I keep feeling a “spicey” vibe. I don’t know if it’s just because I have Ronan on the brain on the time or what. Even with her sassiness, spicey-iness, whatever, I just love her. I love being around her. We have so much fun 99.7% of the time. Her sass tends to be more funny than anything else. It’s so awesome. Sometimes I get this vibe…a vibe that I am going to have a life surrounded by Rockstar’s. Children really are my world. I just adore them. Every single one. It is going to be so awesome…I am looking forward to having a life filled with children.
Why is Military Action Necessary?
As always I wish you time to be creative but most of all time to STAMP!
It applies ONLY to a ten square mile area inside Washington D.C. However ever since the New Millennium began this government has been trying to enforce every law that they have passed for themselves (for that ten-square mile area of Washington DC) onto the rest of us.
The great achievement of the egalitarian lobby will be to have placed 75% of the world's wealth in the hands of totalitarian governments and immensely rich third world plutocrats, for whom human rights is an alien and ludicrous concept.
Where Linda and I grew up there are some wonderfully established Jacaranda trees. My Mum tells me that they were gifts from the local hospital to new mothers when babies were born. Isn't that just lovely?
Hilary: Or, The tower is the eminence of the Law, which ascended from earth to heaven, and from which, as from a watchtower, the coming of Christ might be spied. “And let it out to husbandmen.”
a monkey with a peanut machine
As 45 states, the District of Columbia, and two territories move from widespread adoption of the Common Core State Standards to implementation, there is a need to appropriately identify and link assets using a shared system of identifiers and a common XML representation. There have been several prior efforts at this. The Council of Chief State School Officers (CCSSO) and National Governors Association Center for Best Practices (NGA Center), working closely with the standards authors, aim to put forward a viable approach for publishing identifiers and XML designation to represent the standards, consistent with their adopted format, as outlined below.
11 Tortoise - Goriri (6:40)
Happy C.
Welcome Sketch fans! We have another fun sketch coming for you this go around but first I want to introduce you to 2 new members of our team! Please hop on over to their blogs and give them some BIG yay's!
Now they're celebrating sixteen years of success:
Account wmskstlsports
they eat.
I got angels’ voices and friends who love me for who I am;
The Gator player won the tourney beating the other Khador player in the last round. The winner was gonna be champion, which was pretty amazing since the other Khador player (running Strakhov) is pretty new to the game.
Um, I think I want a Lickitung of my own.
Not to mention the "Mom, I need a ride here," or, "Mom, I forgot my ............"
Kris Aquino will become the 17th president of the Republic of the Philippines according to Half-British and half-Indian psychic Robert Das. That prediction was half-bull, half-sh*t.
Me, I didn’t sleep much. Too many things rattling in my head. I’d tried to work a way to keep the bird safe, but I guessed that was something I had to leave in the hands of the gods.
In Bombay, 12-yr-old Vijay is taken under the wings of the city gang lord Rauf Lala (Rishi Kapoor). From then on it is a journey of revenge where he makes and breaks many relationships only to get closer to his aim. Vijay finds support only in his best friend Kaali (Priyanka Chopra), who stands by him at every moment in his life. Fifteen years later his hatred for Kancha takes him back to Mandwa where life comes full circle.
You look down and close your eyes, droopy. Then expand and stand tall. Raise your face to the sky, turn your hands out, and ask. Out loud. Ask for what you want with your whole heart. (I did it a few times, and it worked so profoundly, I was scared to ask any more. Mistake!)
6 of my favorite people.
Have you every made an organizer out of foam core board? I can now say that I have, and I have an ink pad organizer / storage in the works ;)
blackbirds
Have you ever watched TV without sound?
Point Presenter #3: Katherine Bingham
Way they could have put that over sized
Before I scat, I included what I ate this past weekend in hopes of helping you all make the best out of your situation during your next trip. Again, the following is not perfect, but if you K.I.S.S. and stick to meat and vegetables, you will arrive home in the same condition that you left.
Well, that retainer is made of completely clear plastic and fits right over her teeth to hold them in their new position. She has to wear it at all times, except when she's actually eating. They are quite expensive to replace, and if it is lost you need to replace it within 24 hours or the teeth can start to move.
I think the memorial award will go to Heath Ledger, for Best Supporting Actor, though Robert Downey Jr. should already have had that one messengered over to his house. The Hollywood Foreign Press should be embarrassed that Tom Cruise's name is even up there.
When I take the stage on April 14th, it will be two years exactly, nearly to the hour that I took a ride to Lousisanna in a taxi cab to the mental hospital. In less than two years I have really began putting a nice life together for myself. I want to sing because I have some unfinished business. I am singing a song that I learned over 20 years ago but never sang it. I have many friends from recovery who been so constantly supportive about me growing as a spirit in human form that I can't wait to show them a little of what one part of my life, or one of my man LIVES was like. They have pulled the creativity back out in me. I'll post a video of the show here when I get one.
a riot policeman enraged the Bedoon even further. According to Kuwaiti newspaper Al-Rai, around 108 protesters were arrested on 13 January. They are still in detention as the prosecution keeps delaying their release.
So, now that that’s out of the way, I can get back to my questing. Arelin headed out to Taris, and since the zone is level 32-36 and he was halfway through level 35 already, I skipped the regular stuff and just worked on his class quests. Burek posted a really sweet video guide to using Force Push yesterday. So that was fresh on my mind. Now, I have a pretty regular rotation that I use. Force Push is in it, but it’s buried pretty deep and typically only gets used on elites because everything else dies before I get to it, except for random occasions when I use it as an interrupt. I learned some pretty cool things from the video, but there are other things to keep in mind when using it in PvE. Here are a couple:
The most favorable colors for 2010 prom dresses are those bright, loud and printed ones. Out with the sexy black for white is the new stylish. You can also select dresses that are colored red, magenta, green, violet, and royal blue. A variety of colors in a dress is also trendy such as those accented with floral, waves, checkered or geometric prints.
And that was another thing; their new allies had been fairly accepting of the existence of the Naaru. Some paid them no mind, but many thought their existence sparked curiosity as to their existence and provided even more questions to ask about their faith in the Light. A new era had begun for them, prompting pamphlets, booklets, and novels on the subject. Experts on the Light made copies for all the major churches and sanctuaries of the Light, included their ship turned city, Exodar.
15-13 against the Phillies, won in the bottom of the 12th with a walk off home run by Chipper! The old man still has it! The Braves still have it! We came back from six to nothing and what a battle it was. I didn't think anything could top McCann's grand slam.
11. The Astonishing Adventures of Fanboy and Goth Girl Barry Lyga
I can’t see into the future enough to know whether the pain I’m anticipating will happen or not, but I do find I’m waking up with panic attacks, so I think the wisest thing to do is to try to get some help from a medical professional, rather than from the refrigerator…
Approximately 6.5 million people have Parkinson’s. 1 in 10 are diagnosed before they turn 50. But it’s not just a disease affecting your parents and grandparents, 15% of all Parkinson’s patients are diagnosed before their 40th birthday.
And if you’ve seen the video of Sweet Brown…AINT NOBODY GOT TIME FOR THAT….watch it because I can’t help laughing when she gets interviewed!
Jonathan has talked about sky surfer in Heerenveen for years, and when my dad was there alone with him two years ago they tried it out together; mom and Ryan had also gotten a shot at it before we’d arrived, so John and I were the only newbies. I bravely (and excitedly) volunteered to ride first. (And since I was on the sky surfer, the following photos were taken by Jonathan.)
A tender kiss on your forehead ,sky
"Very sweet...great foreshadowing!" - Judge, TARA contest 2010
Today is Nikki's 40th birthday and Julie organized a card event for her. We did one last year also. The girls on the design team made cards and are mailing them to Nikki. They are all posted over on the Nikki Sivils, Scrapbooker blog.
who decided this
First, we are so thankful for all of the ways that people have shown their concern and love for Ryan and support for our family. Family, friends, neighbors and strangers (now friends) alike…your creativity, generosity and willingness to come along side of us reminds us of this Bible verse:
Actually, Dave and I spent the day out, popping by to see Tyler for about 15 minutes, dropping by the church to say hello and take them a few little Easter gifts (have you thanked your church secretary lately? I bet you would make her day! We love Patty!). I rested in the car as we drove from place to place, and couldn't really stay anywhere for very long, but gosh it felt good to get out in the fresh air and sunshine.
I Love you Mistletoe....for being a symbol of something small, grown within memories to be something great:)
I think we all love a good veggie burger, but they can be expensive and full of processed ingredients when purchased from the store. I have several staple recipes, but this is one of the most versatile. You can use any bean/legume, nut/seed and grain. The combinations are endless and will use what you have on hand! No running to the store for this baby. I used Psyllium Husk as a binder, but you can use ground flax, chia, besan flour, vital wheat gluten or commercial egg replacer.
Hachette AU
A few years back I was lucky enough to hear Bunny Williams give a talk to trade professionals at High Point Furniture Market. I went in with an open mind but realistically expected to hear an "out of touch New York" decorators take on the industry. One of those designers who makes you rid yourself of everything and start from scratch. One of those people who thinks that $500/yard fabric is a "must use." Those folks are out there (and published in lots of magazines) but she certainly wasn't one of them! I was pleasantly surprised to hear her take on the industry, her "lived & learned" experiences, and design philosophy. We were far more alike than I knew and she quickly became one of my very favorite industry professionals.
I was sad. The one thing that held that small bit of baby (nursing) and I wasn't even getting that. Each time I offered and she refused I felt defeated.
Cllr. Paul Preston then spoke on the problem of getting Direct Debits changed, and the amount of time it takes to get money wrongly taken from one's account returned. He gave examples from personal experience.
"Pledges, this is the final task. Fail, and you're out. Succeed and you're in."
Speculation has it that the Bellas’ WWE contract expires at the end of the month, which is ironically today.
Short term support is at SPX 1397, and then the 1386 and 1372 pivot ranges. Short term resistance is at SPX 1414, 1419 and 1422. Short term momentum hit an extremely overbought level on friday, highest since mid-March, and has started to pullback. This rally, from SPX 1359, looks like fives waves thus far: 1376, 1368, 1405, 1397, and 1407. Short term OEW charts have been positive since around SPX 1380. Best to your trading!
In the meantime, don’t let the frustration of distraction and/or a lack of focus derail your efforts and keep you from achieving your goals. When you find yourself in a tailspin of procrastination and distraction, the best thing that you can do is stop, go back to the productivity dashboard, dump all the things that are swimming around in your head, and refocus your efforts by blocking out time to accomplish your most valued priorities.
- Citizenship, nationhood and the State
1 1/2 teaspoons pure vanilla extract
time to move on....
“Lycan Tides” was a 2011 EPIC Finalist for Fantasy Romance.
I realized I only needed 3 yards.... (for my chairs... but double check for yours!)
* Potential spoiler for those of you who haven't read the previous novel in the Harry Dresden series, Changes by Jim Butcher. *
My friend, Diane, over at Freedom's Wings Politics was kind enough to let me post her article from today on the whore defense attorney at the trial of Khalid Sheikh Mohammed....you know, the bitch who wants all women in the court to bow to Islam like her and wear a damn hijab.
1. Oranges:(mainly from stash and small yardage approximately FQ size and smaller) 5 Kona "orange family" solids (3 little pieces left over from the Robert Kaufman solids challenge charm pack in brights); Kona solids in school bus and coral; Kaffe Fassett- Rowan Line Dance; OZ by Sanae for Moda; Floralicious by Michael D'Amore for Benartex; Taza by Dena for free Spirit; Woodland Friends by Ellen Crimi-Trent for Clothworks, Half Moon by Moda; Grad Bazaar by Patty Young for Michael Miller; Metro Living Circles by Robert Kaufman; Fresh Flowers by Deb Strain for Moda; Garden Divas by Jane Sassaman for Free Spirit; A day in the Life by Mummysan for Robert Kaufman, Aviary 2 by Joel Dewberry for Free Spirit; Innocent Crush Maybe by Anna Maria Horner for Free Spirit; Treasures and Tidbits by Piece O' Cake Designs for Robert Kaufman; Tonal Kaleidoscope Gypsy Bandana by Pillow & Maxfield for Michael Miller; Aldo fo Zippy by Jenn Ski/Lilla Rogers Studio for P&B Textiles; Kensington Studio for Quilting Treasures; Simon + Kabuki for Eandl Design, Inc.; Terrain by Kate Spain for Moda; Mingle by Monaluna for Robert Kaufman; and various wonderful orange scraps from Michelle L. (Flickr- I like Orange too) from the Goodie Bag swap (round 2).
5. Remove the pattern and iron the appliqué in place on the front of the house. Do this for the window, door, and house number, using the pattern as a guide for placement. DO NOT decorate your house below the line marked on the pattern, and remember to keep the iron away from any heat-sensitive trims!
As embodied by the teachers unions. This excerpt from an article in today's Detroit News entitled "Tougher teacher no-strike law pushed" shows how the left uses logic, peaceful dialog, and uplifting art to argue their point:
I agree with this. But that goes not to say that I am a purist myself.
2 oz unsweetened chocolate (Or 6 T cocoa pwdr)
Well, that's it for me today. I hope you give this a try if you have any Distress Inks in your stash. They are so much fun to work with!!
LSTC Productives
The attitude of the devotional organisations makes me believe that throughout Indian (and perhaps world) history the scriptures have been often mis-appropriated, misquoted and mis-interpreted by the bhakthi marga, at the cost of the gnyana marga. What gives them the right?
A SIXTEEN YEAR OLD GIRL
My grand return may be slower than I thought I'm fighting off a major cold
difference what the trouble is; whether it’s sickness, bankruptcy, marital
Parent/Teacher Notes: An area for parents and teachers to communicate.
I have been very quiet of late, someone told me once " if you haven't got anything to say, don't say anything", and I suppose I have had that in mind. Winter seems especially grey this year, and I must say I feel like I lost my mojo for a while there. But a nice break in Sydney, a few new adventures (cheese making, you will be hearing plenty about that in the coming weeks) and a bit of navel gazing and hello world, the crockpot is on & I am slowly coming back to a simmer. Hoping to reach a boil by summer:)
Bringing the gifts that my ancestors gave,
--What is it about the flash fiction format that appeals to you? What do you feel are the benefits and the drawbacks of working in the format?
"How do we get in?"
At its core, the question is whether a “business method” is patentable under Canadian law. For the reasons which follow, the Court concludes that a “business method” can be patented in appropriate circumstances.
your overwhelmed chest requires good,
Ha! I forgot what my point is now. Perhaps I jest needed to write this to remind myself why I'm fightin' to begin with. Yeah. I need these reminders sometimes.
I’ve written extensively about ways to restrain the economic power of the wealthy, which largely point to making our tax system more progressive and harder to evade, eliminating corporate welfare, and regulating financial capital to the point where it’s “safe, stable, and boring.” One rare area where there is widespread popular support for progressive causes is tax fairness – witness the popularity of the “Buffett Rule” in the U.S, the unpopularity of Chancellor Osborne’s decision to lower the top income bracket in the U.K, and Hollande of the French Socialists staking his platform on a top tax rate of 75% on the wealthiest.
I posted this on the 'Sustainable Natural Dye Practice' Yahoo group but I thought I would post my question here as well.--
Ah. It's Wednesday. Hump day. Hardest day of the week. So I'm going to take a detour from the usual recipe post and just provide some simple eye candy.
I must pass the vibrant, red Cali Cafe entrance on at least a weekly basis as I walk down the Old Christchurch Road but oddly the thought has never struck me before to stop. Yesterday I decided to make a change. After hearing that Cali Cafe’s owners are Columbian and Brazilian, I scrapped my packed lunch to try a different cuisine.
If you think about it, canning beer makes a lot of sense compared to bottling, firstly there's much less risk of the cap seal failing and the beer oxidising, and there is no risk of the beer within being spoiled by daylight and becoming 'light struck'. They're easier to carry, easier to store and quicker to cool. I'm led to believe than aluminium is a much better recycling material than glass, so they're green too. They certainly take up a lot less space when empty (and crushed).
If I'm lucky, I'll get to connect with
8. The Ruger SR .22 appears to eat almost any ammo with zero problems
For the past 3+ months I've been working so hard on being healthier.
"A seven!"
Yes, I know smoking was bad for me, and that I gave up before the hacking cough and health problems kicked in. I gave up before I reached 40, so I remember all the pleasure cigarettes give the young but none of the downsides, which show themselves later on in life. However, for all the wonders of the world He created, it is surely evidence of a somewhat perverse sense of humour on the part of the maker that so much in life which gives you pleasure, is either bad for you, or makes you fat. There are surely few experiences more dismal than an entirely healthy lifestyle, and that seems rather unfair.
First Layer Prep:
I was expecting to be sleeping off a big ol' hangover today in the confines of my house, enjoying the last few days of my winter break and the dulcet tones of my darling daughters as they bean each other with Wii remotes. However, sadly, I find myself BACK in Kansas City - wherein I just left not five days ago - as my mother has become seriously ill. Thus, I flew back today, and here I am, in the land of single-degree temperatures (9, at present,) watching my mom sleep in her hospital bed.
By the time she was 14, her parents sought help from a top-notch Psychiatrist. His diagnosis? ODD (oppositional defiant disorder). This meant that Ashley had trouble with authority, nothing more. She was in therapy for this with the same doctor for a year, and only seemed to worsen in that time. Her grades were all failing by the time she entered high school, and she began skipping classes. Eventually, she no longer attended and the private school had her suspended permanently.
My third card in my series of "Same But Different", is using the image "You're sew nice..", and as I have said it is from Pamela's blog, "Free Vintage Digi Stamps". Here is a pic.
So we're showering, and I was telling him why it was that I needed these guidelines. I didn't just come out and say "Z, I need you to control parts of my life. I'm a control freak and I feel uneasy during the day....I need your strength and guidance." I know, I know....I should have. But really? That's just so hard to say to him. I spoke carefully, with no tone or any "put downs" towards him...I just told him some things that I would like for our relationship. His response?
When it comes to government, that success/fail feedback isn’t quite as strong, and sometimes it’s the opposite of what it should be.
She ate the scraps she could find for the day
3. Food products (Pineapple cookies, Beef Jerky, Lemon Tarts, Muachi etc) for office and home
My life transition? This year I’ve taken a new job in a new state. It means a big transition for me but it forces my brother into a transition as well. Our lives are intertwined, I impact my brother’s transitions — residential, day, work, whatever. And my brother impacts mine — the people I date, the jobs I take, where I live.
A Discovery of Witches was good. And the Hunger Games trilogy.
tube
This is leaving the safety of talking about the weather and delving right into my comfort zone showing you a glimpse into my life like this. The furball and I have a nice morning routine going. Wake up, get in a good full body scratch, then she goes back to sleep while I get ready for the day. At some point she gets up and starts pressuring me to go upstairs with her relentless meowing as she paces the hall.
So we’re taking a full sized slum dwelling, a freestanding outdoor photographic exhibit, 4,500 photos and stacks of marketing material in between – and a tent and camping gear. I’m not sure if we’ll have room for our bags yet as our youngest daughter has arrived back early from Amsterdam and her seat was meant to be the space for that. On top of that we have people coming to stay at our place while we are away so it has to be spotless before we leave 8am on Saturday!
* When he started work for Helmet, Tunnard was entitled to believe that he could, subject to his obligations as to notice, leave when he wanted and work in competition with Helmet. He was entitled to take preparatory steps before leaving, in order to assess the viability of any potential competitive activity.
24th), 1997 Wylde Hide (UR 22nd); 1998 Gimme Five (5th), 2002 Spot Thedifference (UR 27th); 2003 Youlneverwalkalone (PU bef 13th); 2004 Clan Royal (2nd), Spot Thedifference (5th), Risk Accessor (UR 6th), Le Coudray (Fell 22nd); 2005 Innox (7th), Spot Thedifference (18th), Shamawan (21st), Clan Royal (CO 22nd), Le Coudray (PU before 21st), Risk Accessor (UR 2nd); 2006 Clan Royal (3rd), Risk Accessor (5th), Innox (Fell 1st), First Gold (UR 23rd); 2007 L’Ami (10th), Clan Royal (11th); 2008 King Johns Castle (2nd), L’Ami (Fell 2nd), Bob Hall (PU bef 19th), Butler’s Cabin (Fell 22nd); 2009 Butler’s Cabin (7th), Reveillez (BD 3rd), Can’t Buy Time (Fell 18th), L’Ami (PU bef 30th); 2010 DON’T PUSH IT (WON), Can’t Buy Time (Fell 8th), Arbor Supreme (UR 15th), King Johns Castle (refused to race); 2011 Don’t Push It (3rd), Blue Sea Cracker (14th), Quolibet (UR
What unfortunately follows is – with the software application acting as a security blanket of project management commitment – true PM techniques and principles are often never learned (nor the application, mind you). Firms utilize the “accidental project management” approach, throw a few activities into an .mpp file, and focus much of their effort on the maximizing the practice of “project management by powerpoint” As a consultant, the most important thing to remember is this – Project Management is in the eye of the beholder (no matter what PMI or PRINCE2 or any other BOK may say.) If your client manages projects through Ouija boards and crayons, then so do you. We must learn to adapt and apply what we’ve learned as project managers to each client and each situation. As PM’s, we should never force feed. We must suggest, nurture, cajole – introduce slowly the project management concepts we know and love – and are enablers of success!. After all, they hired us to be project managers, right?
So fret not, Colton Dixon fans, in my completely non-authoritative opinion, we will see much much more of him. I wouldn’t be surprised if he had a record deal by the end of next week, especially if Ellen has anything to do with it!
It is cut small, so that it doesn’t lace up all the way. That way there is a gap in the front for the heart to show though to the skin. I just used one lace to keep the top up, the heart sits just under it. I used a corset because it gives a lot of support with no shoulder straps, which would spoil the look of the Morrigan costume. Things to be aware of when making or buying a corset for this part… make sure the bottom of the corset doesn’t poke out through the leg openings, and the top goes under the top of the bodysuit in the back. The corset also gives great boob support! Here is what it looks like under the bodysuit –
In this respect, sinister role of Indian RAW could also be judged from some other events of sectarian violence. In 2008, in Khyber Agency, intermittent fighting between Lashkar-e-Islam and Ansar-ul-Islam had claimed as many as 1500 lives. Lashkar Islami is led by fanatic cleric Mangal Bagh who follows the puritanical Deobandi form of Sunni Islam and has close connections with the extremist Taliban of Afghanistan. Besides other areas of Pakistan, more than 2000 people died in sectarian riots in Kurram Agency, bordering Afghanistan. Its areas have been hit by fierce clashes, pitching Sunni Muslims against the minority Shias. A number of ceasefires was concluded between the warring sects with the help of government officials and the tribal Maliks, but the same proved fruitless owing to the support from Afghanistan where more than hundred training centers covertly established by RAW are supervising anti-Pakistan activities with the tactical help CIA and Mossad.
So health - emotional and physical may be. Not much in health cards for you, but your creative side is VERY strong now and may be overpowering things.
If I like sniffing pages of a brand new book, I must say that the steep price has eventually put me off. I favor low prices old books that you can still hunt out in some second-hand bookshops. Travel through time starts there.
Tine vs. Target (that's french for 'addiction') goes to Target this time. When I went back on my second trip, I finally located the ginormous ziploc bags. They were over by the kitty litter, which was (as I mentioned before) in the girl's section. Yeah, that makes perfect sense. All I have to say is they better get this remodel done soon. It won't be pretty if I run out of coke and can't find it because they've relocated all the fizzy drinks and put them in among the jock straps and mouthguards. My Target addiction might be strong, but its nothing compared to my coke addiction. If I'm unable to find my coke, people might just get hurt...
Adoption specialists point out that adoptees often feel anger in response to being given away by birth parents, feeling like second class citizens, and feeling unworthy of having anything good happen to them. We must also stay mindful of the fact that many adoptees come from backgrounds where there is a family history of poor impulse control, psychiatric disorders, substance abuse, or other factors that can contribute to a poor modulation of emotions. Thus, when the child is angry, he may have little recognition or control over how intense his response is. Also, children who grew up in violent or chaotic environments had aggression and rage modeled for them and they quickly learn that it is an effective way of getting attention and perhaps even getting one’s needs met.
Geese populations control can be addressed through a variety of preventive and non-lethal humane methods, such as Ovocontrol, which is a USDA-approved birth control drug for use in geese.
They further state:
sent an email to the university asking why I was refused a place.
- Keep your portfolio and CV up to date
Anyone currently using a product named Sulfacet-R or Novacet is already cleaning their face by the use of a sulfur product. In addition to treating acne, sulfur is also used in the treatment of seborrheic dermatitis (a flaking skin rash that is red) and rosacea.
Brulee nodded. “That sounds reasonable,” even though her own voice sounded slightly suspicious.
Throws off a sweet floral smell as the head dissipates, and settles to a nice grainy smell. Still a bit sweet, apparently from the lactose.
I wonder why I've never noticed these conifers change colour before? I was rather puzzled as I presumed all conifers were evergreen . Seems that they are not( took me a long time to realise this ...did anybody else think the same ? ) and I think these are Larch...........
We had a new central air unit put in, today (replaced our old one). The guy in charge (co-owner of the small outfit selling the unit and doing the work) was incredibly pleased that we cut them a check for the full amount owed before he left. The two younger guys he had doing the real grunt work were incredibly pleased with the pieces of chocolate cake (made fresh last night) I sent with them--possibly more than if we'd given them cash tips.
Jack Kvancz
ON A TREADMILL:Warm up for 10 minutes. Run for five minutes with treadmill at 1% incline at a speed that hits 90 to 95% of your max heart rate. After a two-minute recovery jog, repeat two more times. Cool down for 10 minutes. Add one interval every two weeks until you reach six.
There's still plenty to choose, with the cheapest option at $5 for a meatball slider, topping out at $22 for the grilled skirt steak with mojo verde and fries. The bar staff raise an eyebrow when we order six dishes to share between the three of us - "that's a lot of food" we're warned, but we foolishly laugh in the face of calorific sensibility.
Chicken jaffle $7.50
He joins a band of bounty hunters whose activities degenerate to massacre, robbery and rape (the leader Glanton, is based on an actual historical figure and many events in the book have their roots in history). They kill for money and for fun. And sometimes they kill for no obvious reason at all. It’s pretty grim.
Dennis A. Cross, 60, Islip Terrace, N.Y.
Ink: Pumpkin Pie, Wild Wasabi SU Markers, Memento Black
Beginning his labour, Sanderson announced that the series would be finished in three volumes. The first, The Gathering Storm, was released last year, and the second The Towers of Midnight has just come out this November. I, the obedient dog, bought and read it in the week and a half after its release. What follows are my thoughts about the conclusion of the series (no spoilers).
Inside cheeks blush with punch and laughter. A small hand, sticky with chocolate, pulls a red velvet dress. The candle light shatters through crystal prisms and dances in glazed-over eyes.
What this means it that the bacteria use a small amount of energy (2 electrons) and two hydrogen ions to create ammonium hydroxide and water. Then they convert the ammonium hydroxide into nitrites, 5 hydrogen ions, and more energy (4 electrons). It’s not very efficient, but it’s enough for these bacteria to live on. Note that there are 5 hydrogen ions produced for every 2 ions used… this increases the acidity of the water.
Me: Okay, there you go, kiddo. Two piggie tails coming out the top, just like you ordered.
As the verse reads, the centurion ran away out of sheer fear but the chief captain, because of his position had to face up to him. Then by way of the fact that he had Paul bound, he had an additional worry. If this action got back to Rome he would be in dire straits. It could cost him his citizenship or perhaps his life.
I have joined up with over 130 other teachers to give you a SPECIAL FREE gift on Sunday, May 6th. This will be a blog hop that you won't want to miss out on.
Jack Nicholson sums up this premise in the opening lines of the film. "When I was your age, they would say we could either be cops or criminals. Today what I'm saying is this: when you're facing a loaded gun, what's the difference?" But this is just the premise upon which Scorcese builds.
Not in itself necessarily a bad reason.
This is the post where I go all Loco about Valentine's Day. It's a nice holiday and all, but its not for me. It's mostly commercial, and as my dear husband has pointed out before, "Every day is like Valentine's Day when you live with him." That used to bug the crap out of me, but you know I totally get it. If we can't be nice and do kind things for each other 364 days out of the year, then that one day, Valentine's Day, isn't really going to make any difference even if Hallmark tells us to... I'm not completely anti, I do buy my kids a treat and a card.
What has Nelson Mandela done to fight against the ANC’s coerced and forced integration policy of Black Elite Supremacy, wherein black Africans, under the black ANC government (a) no longer have the highest per capita income and education levels for Africans in Africa; (b) have experienced a drop in life expectancy from 64 years to below 50, (c) have experienced a significant increase in infant mortality; and (d) massive increases in unemployment due to among others illegal immigrants and massive corruption and looting of the public purse by the alleged ‘liberation struggle ANC’?
MMMWWAAAHHH!!
I’ve only ever written novels, though I wouldn’t mind a tilt at TV one day. They are very different media which is why you need to change things, substantially sometimes, when you transfer stories between them. Novels work on the imagination and, if they succeed, take the reader directly into the story. TV is a passive medium in which the screen is the boss and says ‘Watch now’ until it’s done. And you have actors in TV – wonderful actors in the case of The Killing, which means they can get away with unresolved narrative issues which would never be allowed in a book. TV has a visceral immediacy and the ability to mix the visual, the auditory and the dramatic in a way that can root you to the spot. Books are more subtle it seems to me, and ultimately more memorable. My take on The Killing departs from the TV version in some very significant ways, especially at the end. But it’s been interesting that some devoted Killing followers haven’t spotted that. It’s because TV is very much of the moment, I suspect. You’re a spectator, not a participant as you are in a good book. That said I’d still like to write TV before long – it’s such an adventurous and ambitious medium in the right hands.
Medium Fish are the standard, so I’m going to start here. Basically, if the PCs are meant to be ‘medium’, it means that, while they are generally quite capable, there are a lot of big baddies in the world they can’t handle. Your average thugs and minions aren’t much of a problem, the elite guards of the enemy should pose a significant health threat, and the big, big baddies should be beyond their capabilities until they either find a clever way to defeat them or grow in power somehow.
Two of my five kids have food allergies to items like dairy, eggs, and nuts. It has been a 17 year mission for me to make sure that there day to day lives did not feel any more restricted than any other child. I wanted them to be able to eat the same foods as the rest of us, or better.
The negativity that results from this line of argument can be qualified by way of Noys’ excellent introduction, which describes affirmationism’s emergence from two prior theoretical trends. The first of these trends is a nihilistic, post-1968 tendency to align emancipatory potential with the unleashing of capital flows (linked to the early 1970′s work of Baudrillard, Deleuze and Lyotard); but having been rendered untenable by the realities of 1980′s neo-liberalism, this is said to have given rise to a subsequent interest in linking opposition to transcendence, difference, and otherness. Affirmationism’s concerns with immanent, but also oppositional forms synthesised these two tendencies, and Noys shares its consequent avoidance of associating oppositional negativity with either immanence or transcendence: he contends that a focus on the generation of immanent difference would echo the operation of real abstraction, whilst transcendent externality mirrors the ‘void’ of abstract value itself. His account of negativity as ‘immanent rupture’ (17) is not associated with either pole: it is ‘internal’ (128) to the positivity that it contests, but it exists in a ‘relation of rupture’ (172) with it.
Use this report to:
That lead to the thought of throat cancer-a very real possibility, considering my smoking habits. Throat cancer would be my best option, I think. I could deal with that one.
Methods of paying online will be made more secure. The USA already has a card chip standard, which doesn’t rely on using PINs, as an online authorisation strategy. Online retailers are likely to continue to use 3D secure solutions to payment problems – that is, using a code and password to complete an online transaction. Various techniques to prevent ID theft are also being developed as this is a growing problem.
Party Time’s wouldn’t work, and the more frustrated he got the more he pulled and jerked at his big brown trunk. At one point he yanked at it so hard I thought he was gonna rip it off.
These foodie joints also had something else in common – they were all owned and operated by a community that comes from the west coast of India, known as the Malabar Coast.
Peace, Blessing, and E.. don't say it!!!!!... to all.
"I heard Nixon speak. He was talking about free enterprise, getting government off your back, lowering taxes and strengthening the military. Listening to Nixon speak sounded more like a breath of fresh air. I said to my friend, 'What party is he?' My friend said, 'He's a Republican.' I said, 'Then I am a Republican!'”
NYS Senator Eric Adams invites you to join...
well I think I am going to go to bed and see if I can get some sleep .. my eyes are very gritty and I have a bit of double vision happening .. haha .. so I am hoping what I have written actually makes sense ... or at the very least .. legible ...
"We need to disturb criminal's methods by infiltrating their nests," Cwela said.
On Saturday Brett participated in the 4-H Foods Revue. This is a county event where kids create a menu, one or more items on the menu and the place setting to be judged. This is Brett’s first year so he was in the first class with 4 other kids. He made a snack: fruit kabobs and cake batter dip.
DCWV Glitter Cardstock
Los Angeles Times
74 ***1. Book Review: Harry V. Jaffa, Equality and Liberty: Theory and Practice in American Politics (New York, 1965). New York University Law Review, vol. 41, pp. 664-77 (1966). (Sources: Items D-XI/14/1961 and D-III/21/1962, below. Incorporated in Item B-2, above, pp. 61-73, 260-68 (1975).)
2. Young man’s fancy. Lightly, heavily gaily etc. etc.
(and before the dent in my leg).
I’m sure none of you have ever heard of this movie or that even if you have, you most likely did not bother to watch it. As for me, whenever Vampires are the main characters of movies or novels I tend to get curious and want to know what it is all about. I was actually about to watch the Vampire Diaries Season 3 Ep 20 but this movie’s title caught my attention and I just had to check it out. I would have been so happy if it had been up to my expectations and even above but it wasn’t. Jasin, the leader of the Vampire coven/ brood is looking for who he is supposed to spend the rest of eternity with before his 101 birthday. He is torn between the gorgeous Tara, who is already open to the idea of becoming a Vampire and Caleb.
Boscoe learned very well, so well that he was always the model for the other dogs in the class, but then Boscoe was a Border collie and would have learned well no matter what. I picture Border collies in the wild, feral Border collies, sitting politely and heeling and coming when called and not wolfing their food and doing the dishes immediately after eating and never leaving the house without first making their beds.
By 1930, he was an M.C. at the Palace. In 1932, he formed a sort of loose team with Jack Haley co-hosting at the Palace. This and a couple of early talkies were the summit of his success. He had a difficult personality that kept getting in his way. He was fired from the 1925 Ziegfeld revue No Foolin’ for mouthing off to the boss. He blew a contract with Fox Pictures by refusing to get a nose job. Similar bad luck plagued him with his shot at a radio program for Orange Julius, which was canceled after one broadcast.
I'd love to tell you that I graciously excused myself from our gathering and quickly walked toward the exit. I'd love to tell you that my leave from the room would have shamed any of Martha Stewart's classes on grace & poise. I'd love to tell you that I'm calm, cool, & collected in emergencies. However - my exit resembled more of a Lucille Ball skit complete with papers flying and my heels flapping as I bolted from the room.
Once again, Wreck This Journal has conjured wonderful memories and returned me to a frame of mind where leaves rustle, trees sway, and waves crash against the shore. Perhaps, I am drawn to natural beauty because it anchors me to the things that matter most.
And don’t forget to purchase your Grand Raffle tickets while online. Take a chance to win $1,000 food and wine pairing from The Capital Grille, or Red Sox tickets, or a Long’s Jewelers Gift Certificate.
“So, it turned out the vibrating egg wasn’t supposed to go ALL the way into your ass, do you understand what I’m talking about?”
Wow, it seems strange that Christmas is over already! So much preparation and excitement and stress, then the whole damn thing is over in a flash.
Hopes that he’ll too have a reason soon,
A strange thing happened to me in between the first season of Laid and this second season premiere – I grew fonder of the show. This doesn’t mean my opinion of the first season changed; I still think of it as a drippy, one-note, trying-too-hard dramedy, but I did find myself strangely looking forward to the new season because of two key cast members. Let’s place the blame for this at the feet of The Little Dum Dum Club, a hilarious podcast hosted by Karl Chandler and Tommy Dassalo where each episode they invite a comic into the studio for a chat. Celia Pacquola has been on the show once by herself and once with her boyfriend, and Laid co-star, Toby Truslove and both of them were very funny and delightful and I liked them so much I was half-convinced the second season of Laid might be better. While this episode doesn’t come across as self-satisfied as the show did in its first season, a lot of the things that didn’t work the first time around still don’t work the second time around.
“Well, if they were choosing the best and brightest, maybe they figured these kids would one day rise to important positions in the society, and they wanted to gain long-term control over them, so they would be under their thumb, so they could tap them at will — a way of controlling the future society.” Testimony of MK ULTRA Child Victim, March 15, 1995, in Washington, D.C., before the President’s Committee on Radiation [36]
WWII is entering its last phase: Germany is in ruins, but does not yield. The US army lacks crucial knowledge about the German units operating on the opposite side of the Rhine, and decides to send two German prisoners to gather information. The scheme is risky: the Gestapo retains a terribly efficient network to identify and capture spies and deserters. Moreover, it is not clear that “Tiger”, who does not mind any dirty work as long as the price is right, and war-weary “Happy”, who might be easily betrayed by his feelings, are dependable agents. After Tiger and another American agent are successfully infiltrated, Happy is parachuted in Bavaria. His duty: find out the whereabouts of a powerful German armored unit moving towards the western front.
Then Dondo, Mozambique.
Such a talented we team have, we are very lucky!!
Minutes before me
Not that his story really needs a lot of exaggeration. He apparently faked illness to distract his guards, and escaped during the night. According to ABC News’ account, which was furnished by one of those who aided Guangcheng in his escape, he climbed a wall, swam across a river, and walked for hours before he was picked up by allies. He’s been blind since childhood, so he had develop sharp hearing, and it’s that which allowed him to navigate through the darkness that slowed his guards’ efforts to find him.
- Sister Laudem Gloriae, O.C.D.
Terrence Malick, The Tree of Life
This picture is a very special souvenir from my University graduation way back in 1996. I really enjoyed my 5 years at University studying as an English major, but i was SO excited to finally graduate and start a new chapter of my life. They often say that no matter the experience, most important are the people you meet and the friends you make along the way... Well, i was truly blessed to have met Line during my 2nd year at University and for the next 4 years, we were almost inseparable. She quickly became one of my dearest friends, my 'Partner in Crime' as we liked to call each other back then. Nowadays, we don't get to see each other or talk that often, but she will always hold a very special place in my heart and will always be at the top of the list, where best friends are concerned!
8) Menu Planning
I'm in a hurry. There's a truck on its way, and I promised I'd meet it at gate one, and show him where to crane-off the load. So, supermarket to buy lunch.
Liquid Crystal
There’s an intermediate scene in which Natalie shows up after a long absence. This is the part that was sort of like the dream. Fortunately Bill is out when Natalie shows up but Jeannie nearly loses her meal. In fact she does, with the shock of it. She’s been miserable. She’s making every sacrifice she makes for the sake of Sophie, who ever day seems farther and farther away. Sophie has become a sneaky little shit whose loyalties lie far closer to the Narren than to those of the human race.
Coats, who studied Ancient History and Classics at university, says her interest in Greek mythology began at a young age. “From the age of about eight I read everything I could get my hands on and that has stayed with me. I love the fact that the myths can be endlessly recycled and told in different ways. If I am writing a contemporary story, I can take a character or two from the myths, adapt them and make their stories relevant to today.”
V. Create ‘an intermediate-term business strategy.
In the light of the above findings and circumstances, this Office is of opinion, and so holds that the dismissal of the appeal of Felipe Eco is perfectly in order. This is because of his adamant stand (not) to submit to the formal investigation duly ordered by this Office. A clear indication of this attitude is shown by his failure to appear at the investigation on May 2, 1957, when he was duly notified thereof thru his counsel.
Lyrical theme(s): Theistic Satanism, Self-Destruction
Lord Davies said: ‘We are on a steady journey towards our 25 per cent target, but the reality is that a lot more still needs to be done.’
Add the butternut squash and continue cooking, uncovered for 20 minutes. Stir in the whole wheat couscous and cook for another 10 minutes until the couscous pearls have plumped up and the squash is tender. Season with salt and pepper to taste.
Today was a good day. I woke up with a positive attitude. I was excited to get my day going. I had this list of things I wanted to get done—most of which had to do with creating wealth—before I went to my friend’s for dinner. However, by the time I ate breakfast, did my exercises and iced my knee, the day was gone. I was so tired after exercising that I had to take a nap—something I’ve been doing a lot of lately.
It's Lonestar Lonestar
1.) Becoming a MRS. in March!!!!!! That's 77 days away... oh em geeee!
Grifter #9:
If Tengku is to be an ordinary ‘wakil rakyat’, Tengku should please let the rulers know that Malaysia is an embarrassment because of the Constitution. As internationally and by UN considerations, even in proper application of Islam, with many of the laws and constitutional articles of Malaysia are outdated (even poorly written) and amount to a display of human rights abuse. If the citizens do not act,the citizens will continue to suffer, so when citizens act it is not out of inclination to disruptiveness but a seeking of justice.
Borrowed - Blue ink used to dull down the blue of the title lettering.
And it was like scoring a try at Twickenham. Although Andy did disparage my celebration of running high fives whilst holding a razor sharp knife because "That's how accidents happen Danny." And told me in no uncertain terms to put the blade down. But still, it was fun.
Professor Hazard himself used to practice the discipline of homeopathy but has now deferred to complementary medicines. He has accused professionals in the field of “cherry-picking” results in order to suit themselves in order to prove that the treatments work. The Department of Health were clear in their opinion that patients should be given the choices about their treatments, including homeopathy, and the actual figure suggests that only 0.001 per cent of the budget is spent on these types of treatment.
"Do you have the tickets?" Josh asked me.
Processed foods like deli meats contain a lot of sodium, which can interrupt sleep by raising your blood pressure and dehydrating you, Cornell’s Maas says. Caffeine, meanwhile, stays in your system for up to 12 hours, so the effects of a p.m. latte could linger till midnight. Try skipping the joe tomorrow: Not having caffeine for a single day can improve sleep quality that night, a study in the Journal of Clinical Nursing found.
The bilboard speaks beauty over your birth,
As I post this, Plejarans have engaged Mantis and Draco ships over Hermosilla in the Mexican state, Sonora.
The report highlights the worrying increase in the use of torture against detainees, citing a 33.3% increase over 2010 in the number of cases of abuse of all kinds, including torture.
In any case the government has only Thursday and Friday to get the Bill through in this session because on Monday the House is scheduled to discuss the maha-controversial Lokpal Bill and the day after that i.e. 22nd is the last day of the present budget session. This would mean that the Copyright Bill would be shunted to the monsoon session.
Mileage: 55,000 km
1. Rinse beef and scald to remove blood water.
People may think of the Fourth of July as sitting back with a nice cold beer, and a chance to relax and visit with family. Even though I get excited about these things also, I really think of those who are serving, and have served, in order for us to have a drink and share the holiday together.
And I have missed you...
Does it matter then what the nose looks like? In an ideal world we would all like our teams to build cars that look nice at the same time as ‘going like stink’ and maybe McLaren are the team, so far, that have managed this but given a choice between a pretty car or one that is going to go faster, as a F1 fan, I would want the faster car! If this style of nose helps Ferrari, Force India and Caterham to improve their chances within the race then ‘bring on the ugly noses’ is what I say!
So that’s the main thing I remember about that film. And then, of course, it was a disaster when it came out - and almost immediately it also turned into a cult film – and it still is! Frankly, I don’t quite understand why – except that there’s no movie remotely like it. I saw it again a little over 10 years ago at a film festival in Dallas. They wanted me to come down because they couldn’t get anyone else so I went. And the category it was in was called “Films We Love to Hate”. And I thought wait a minute, they didn’t tell me that! And then I was interviewed in front of an audience at a midnight showing. They were asking me about Otto Preminger. And I said he was one of the great film directors and everybody laughed out loud. Then I started to list a number of movies that are remarkable and have some range. And at every one I said, they would laugh. “Wait a minute,” I said, “This is not being fair.” “Yeah, but Skidoo - we hear it’s terrible.” And I said, “Every film director who’s made a lot of movies has made a couple that don’t work – and by the way Skidoo does have a following.” So then I settled down with them to watch the film and I was like, “Oh God, it is terrible. It’s awful.” He was trying for something original and unusual – and he was challenging himself – but he didn’t know how to do it. It just wasn’t his thing.
3 medium potatoes, peeled,
Anyway I was able to find my groundation once I heard ppl chuckle at me mentioning how different Kelowna was compared to my urban jungle childhood. This gave me the courage to focus on my Grandmother’s hands. I told the attendees that I always remember my Grandma doing things with her hands…making things; cooking things; mending; working; playing; creating with her hands. I then tried to remember the section of my poem that my Grand dad liked best…I hadn’t looked at the poem since last Thurs nite so it took me a minute to retrieve the words. Little shaky but it eventual settled into a rhythm and flo and were spoken out loud. The truth is as I get older my hands are reminding me more and more of my Nana’s.
With defenders of the faith like these ones, I am sure the Jews have nothing to worry about from the likes of Hezbollah.
Lunch was a big salad and dinner was the veggie soup from last night plus sweet potato and carrot *fries*....I should have known I wouldn't like the baked carrots and I should have just eaten them raw. But the sweet potato were delicious with some cumin and salt and pepper on them, they had a nice spice. I will definitely make these again.
In the mean time, all of my worldly possessions are being put into boxes by four nice young men, led by a lovely gentleman who sounds a bit like Larry the Cable Guy. They will cart it all away tomorrow, leaving us to wend our way Southward, and if we're lucky they'll give it all back a week from now. And then all the things that took them a day to pack will take me 3+ months to unpack***, something which makes me rather sad.
04 - Bounty Hunter 02:52
His cherry blossom heart
Now it is considered abnormal to not have a smart phone or a facebook page or a twitter account. The systems in place to see those products and narratives into your hands and at your constant disposal take up more resources than they put back in to the world. Any critique of these systems of mass communication is mostly greeted with a blank stare and a saddened frown. At its worst, the reaction can be openly hostile and personally aggressive. You’re holding up the line, asshole.
Normally it isn’t that weird to see Jews and Druzes in a positive relation, but this case differs, since the Druze youths are from Majdal Shams, which is situated in the Golan, next to the Syrian border, and many of the Druzes there holds great sympathy for Syria, at least among the older generation. I have talked with some younger Druzes from the Golan, who told me that their generation felt more connected to Israel, though the older generation wanted to return to Syria. That was some years ago though and I don’t know how it is today, though I don’t think it has changed that much.
It's called the Peter Principle.
“It’s-“ Addison was going to correct Janette on her name but she heard the line click as Janette put her on hold. “Addison.” Letting out an annoyed sigh, she looked out the window angrily as she waited for someone to pick up.
I wanted to pass on an email I received from Focus On The Family. We are living in troubled times and as much as I hate to admit this, I believe that we as the Church have invited this upon ourselves by placing evil or ungodly men in positions of governmental power and influence who have used their positions of influence to enact laws that now threaten families and especially the safety of our own children. Without getting political, let me say that your voice matters and the fact that we have not supported Born Again governmental leaders or demanded that the ungodly follow Biblical principles in leading our nation has brought us to the kind of problems echoed in this troubling report. Check it out.
The roads, including the Interstate Highway System, that are paid for by people whose gasoline tax payments constitute one HELL of a lot bigger share of their income than yours, not to mention, in many cases, bonds that drivers and non-drivers alike pay for. (Fun fact: Pedestrians and private 4-wheel vehicles a disproportionately high share of the costs connected with road maintenance; 18-wheelers, many of which routinely travel over weight limits, pay a disproportionately LOW share of the costs.)
Director : Edward Buzzell
In the spirit of men like Bob Geldof feeding the starving, I feel us as a community ought to come to the aid of our Belgian brothers in their hour of need. I propose a grog whip round to be sent to Belgium. Any spare grog, whether lout or pongy ale can be sent to me and I’ll make sure it gets to Belgium. Rest assured the grog will not just sit in my fridge and be necked whilst I lounge on the couch farting and watching documentaries on channel four about fat kids, and laughing my head off when they run. Of course I’ll have to check the grog for quality control purposes, but the Belgians will be welcome to come and pick up their grog any time they like.
What they have done in the United Kingdom in publicly calling for the overthrow of the royal Palace — as in Constitutional law — is described as HIGH TREASON — as any such threatened overthrow “compasses the death of the Sovereign.”
Profiles of distilleries that did make the cut include the name of each, the owners’ names, contact information, websites, social media accounts where applicable, the types of spirits produced, awards, and other details that help to flesh out our understanding of each.
Punk fans at the time couldn't imagine the results of this band, most definitely they certainly couldn't have foreseen this bladerunner styled concept album about a teenager who stumbles onto an ex-CIA agents tapes all about who really runs world affairs, as Dr. Beter details. Razor sharp guitars, searing torches including acoustic guitars. "No Dreams" lays out an agenda that would loom large in Bator's next band. The rest of the album runs similarly bleak. Without a doubt, "Ready To Snap" is the highlight of the album and is a battle cry to commence the boot boys to teenage war. The sophistication of this work has never been properly honored, seems to have never hit,, bellowing over the heads of many a punk.
My pain was bad, but the pain of women with breast cancer is worse. The number of my friends who have or have had breast cancer is growing at an alarming rate (I was warned this would happen after 40). There is no way to neatly tie this up with a humorous punch line.
Hi Dawn, I loved your interview. You did not look as bad as you said you did.
В гостях у козлов и Далай Ламы Mitchell Bard: Iran, Israel and the United States — What History Tells Us Outrageous: Catherine Ashton compares murder of Jewish children in France with deaths of ‘Palestinian’ children in Gaza EU’s Catherine Ashton compares kids murdered in France with Gaza
*Guinsoo types something on the computer.*
I'm not going to make empty promises about updating my blog every week because I don't think I'm there yet. Hopefully I will be soon, but somehow my drive has gone.
Only ingesting large amount of hair, resulting in trichobezoars (swallowed hairballs), can “cause abdominal pain and other symptoms” (NY Times Health Information).
It may look back infighting between EDL at the demo... but no! We will be fighting with Nazis and UAFs who are pretending to be EDL. We should make this clear to the media if any infighting does occur. Such in-fights have happened before at EDL demos between EDL stewards and EDL fakes.
From color, to size, to showing too much You Are What You Wear will help you discover the psychology behind why you choose what you choose to wear. This guide will also help you uncover the reasons why you shop and what you shop for – are you searching for particular labels, are you searching for items to cover yourself up? Are you trying to stay in a certain decade? Are you trying to be someone you’re not?
Base don characters created by Beverly Cross
Today was blustery.
So, today I'm linking up with Heather again for her Book Club Friday and talking about Jane Green's newest novel, Another Piece of My Heart.
And yet, the shared sense of destiny and Becoming became and
Let me hit you with a few statistics. Did you know that 60% of men and 40% of women will have an affair at some point in their marriage? It is estimated that 53% of all people will have one or more affairs during their life time and that younger people are more likely candidates; in fact younger woman are just as likely as younger men to be unfaithful (womansavers.com). It breaks my heart to look at these statistics. The numbers have only been getting higher.
Well, if you read this, it may be that you will want to read the articles in full. God Bless!
Banality between slices of ennui
Reduce the heat to low and cook for 1 hour. This will cook the sausage the rest of the way.
Dean Jeffries was also innovative the the field of Kustom Kulture clothing. He got into airbrushing, and is oft credited as being the first guy to airbrush custom tees and sweatshirts– check the handiwork he’s wearing in the pic above. Back when he was hangin’ around with Von Dutch (who was fond of painting a third eyeball on his forhead), it’s said that Jeffries created the now iconinic “flying eyeball” that Von Dutch and Ed Roth were known and credited for. Whatever the case may be, Jeffries doesn’t seem too worried about it. Another first credited to Dean Jeffries– the metalflake paint job.
If you try to talk to the bison,
In 2001, He founded Aamir Khan Productions with Lagaan which was directed by Ashutosh Gowarikar and then came Taare Zameen Par and through this film he turned into direction in 2007. In 2008, he launched his nephew Imran Khan in “Jaane Tu Yaa Jaane Naa” which was a commercial success and now next films under his production house are “Dhobi Ghaat” which is directed by his wife Kiran Rao and other film is “Delly Belly” in which Imran Khan plays the main lead.
Amongst other things, the tests confirmed that the Snatch was "overmatched" by the then current array of IEDs ranged against it, and also "revealed" that even when soldiers wore body armour the Snatches provided little protection from IEDs.
Event Deadline: 24th of the month
N. T. Wright identifies five “big questions” in his description of the worldview of the Second Temple period (see NTPG chapter 5, JVG chapter 10). All cultures have to answer these questions, but Wright is only concerned with the world of the first century – how might Paul answer these questions?
We lament, as we often do, the declining levels of inter-ethnic contact in the country; and we bemoan that the so-called ‘golden years’ of Malaysia in the 1950s and 1960s are long gone. And yet we maintain this inane belief that by segregating children from an early age along linguistic-cultural lines we can still forge a Malaysian nation, together. How? And upon what basis would that shared sense of national belonging be found?
Yield: about 1/2 cup
It was only a very short while after that I started the phone calls and the interviews, and only a week or so after those that Joe and I had plane tickets in our hands for Hawai’i! To live and work for what looked like at least ten years. Never before in my life had I had a prayer answered. Whats more, I don’t think I wound up in Hawai’i just because its GREEN, I think it was because of Aloha, and how I needed that to help heal my soul too. I know there is two parts to every equation and that I must learn what Hawai’i needs from me as well, and I am learning, but for me Aloha is an answer to a much deeper and more profoundly impactful question, “how do we heal the sickness that is ravaging our world?” The same sickness of people using each other that I escaped from in Vegas and is spreading across the world, I honestly believe the answer is Aloha. I already love this place, and I wound up here for a reason, I’m not an invader, but want to help defend it, and spread its medicine.
what I am feeling
“We will participate again if they maintain similar requirements. However, if requirements are changed drastically, we will not take part,” Curado said in a conference call with reporters.
Now he has escaped, leaving only two clues as to where he might be headed: Harry Potter’s defeat of You-Know-Who was Black’s downfall as well. And the Azkaban guards heard Black muttering in his sleep, “He’s at Hogwarts…he’s at Hogwarts.”
Average advertising people are good listeners. Exceptional advertising people are good noticers.
You Asked: Boarding passes
7. Do you think you are going to finish it?
There are many varieties of squeaky shoes. They come in boy and girl designs. Girl squeaky sandals are so adorable. Of course they’re pink. Little boys get squeaky sandals are adorable too. They’re traditional brown in a similar style as the girl’s. The shoes themselves for girls are pink with a flower. For boys, shoes are traditional navy and white, resembling adult shoes. And for your athlete, there are even squeaky sneakers.
He was very funny trying to impersonate Jagger and he was definitely giving his all to the performance, but the dance just didn’t have the attack the Tango needs.
The guidon flags flutter gayly in the wind.
But He bids me still to wait, an’ ready aye to be,
Wednesday: May I ask you a question?
we generally include more than just those colours.
I wouldn’t say that I’m a hardcore addict, but I definitely love food.
Exciting things are happening:﻿
Even a multitrillion-dollar package of spending cuts and tax increases would not have stopped the red ink. At best, the grand bargain being sought would have shaved about $4 trillion from deficits expected to total at least $8 trillion over the next 10 years. But it could have changed the storyline of the nation’s politics, if not its government. Obama would have been able to run for a second term claiming bipartisan success at fiscal restraint, a boast he hoped would help erase or at least blur the image of him as a tax-and-spend liberal.
Sony SDX4-200C, AIT4 mp3 may seamlessly retain 200GB data. Native capability associated with The new sony AIT4 capsule is equivalent to those of LTO2 mp3. However AIT4 tape capsule holds more levels of compacted data, that is 520 GB. It has occurred feasible through increasing the data compressing capability of AIT-4 drives to two.6:1. Compressed storage capability of LTO ultrium2 cartridge is 400 Gigabyte. Sony AIT-4 hard disks may efficiently backup 86.Four Gigabyte native data, therefore fulfilling the requirements associated with business course automatic at the greatest cost.
I find it hard to be critical of a surplus budget brought down by a Leftist government. I never thought to see such a thing in my lifetime. And the fact that the surplus was partly achieved by welfare cuts is all the more amazing. And even the defence cuts did not involve any reduction in personnel numbers. And allowing for business losses to be carried backwards as well as forwards is both innovative and potentially very helpful to business. And lifting the tax-free threshold was WAY overdue.
3) I used to horse ride
ONCE UPON A TIME, a little boy with a big sword went into battle against Mister Rogers. Or maybe, if the truth be told, Mister Rogers went into battle against a little boy with a big sword, for Mister Rogers didn’t like the big sword. It was one of those swords that really isn’t a sword at all; it was a big plastic contraption with lights and sound effects, and it was the kind of sword used in defense of the universe by the heroes of the television shows that the little boy liked to watch. The little boy with the big sword did not watch Mister Rogers. In fact, the little boy with the big sword didn’t know who Mister Rogers was, and so when Mister Rogers knelt down in front of him, the little boy with the big sword looked past him and through him, and when Mister Rogers said, “Oh, my; that’s a big sword you have,” the boy didn’t answer, and finally his mother got embarrassed and said, “Oh, honey, c’mon, that’s Mister Rogers,” and felt his head for fever. Of course, she knew who Mister Rogers was, because she had grown up with him, and she knew that he was good for her son, and so now, with her little boy zombie-eyed under his blond bangs, she apologized, saying to Mister Rogers that she knew he was in a rush and that she knew he was here in Penn Station taping his program and that her son usually wasn’t like this, he was probably just tired …. Except that Mister Rogers wasn’t going anywhere. Yes, sure, he was taping, and right there, in Penn Station in New York City, were throngs of other children wiggling in wait for him, but right now his patient gray eyes were fixed on the little boy with the big sword, and so he stayed there, on one knee, until the little boy’s eyes finally focused on Mister Rogers, and he said, “It’s not a sword; it’s a death ray.” A death ray! Oh, honey, Mommy knew you could do it …. And so now, encouraged, Mommy said, “Do you want to give Mister Rogers a hug, honey?” But the boy was shaking his head no, and Mister Rogers was sneaking his face past the big sword and the armor of the little boy’s eyes and whispering something in his ear–something that, while not changing his mind about the hug, made the little boy look at Mister Rogers in a new way, with the eyes of a child at last, and nod his head yes.
“NOTHING WILL GET IN MY WAY TODAY”,I scream aloud as I journey on my way.
Now you can chose to believe me or not
In South Africa, these are more commonly called gumboots.
that we all assume to be.
After all, isn't that what so many adults these days are desperately trying to find out about themselves? Wouldn't it be more efficient if we'd start working on that before frustration and disappointment have already clobbered people down?
In the bento: Tiny cheese ravioli bake, steamed broccoli, baby corn, orange slices and chunks of black plum.
Please know that this is only the 1st step, a beginning to getting your life back on track and regaining control over your pain issues.
It is this human characteristic,
A few little drops of food colouring
in an upstairs room.
It’s looking like there will be no school on Thursday…. Anyone got any suggestions for things to do while “sheltering in place” with your kids?
"Mommy Mommy you will never guess what is in our backyard!" screams of delight came pouring in from my very excited little garden helper as he raced to the backdoor.
He concludes by saying:
xvi) all sectors of society should be served, including its participation in all norm-setting activity;
by Robin Altman, MD
those who are just getting started. It is a working manual that covers
Not to mention I have been busy at PTO functions, soccer games,cheer leading practice, on two mini vacations and trying desperately to keep my girls out of trouble!
I'm entering this into the following challenges......
Still, the DEIS acknowledges that, “In 2016, with mitigation, all significant impacts would be fully mitigated at 29 out of 68 intersections; some but not all significant impacts would be mitigated at a further 37 intersections, and no significant impacts would be mitigated at a total of two intersections.”
Problem is, where does that leave inner city kids who don’t have the ways or the means to get out and see nature — much less to contemplate its beauty?
Another free image this time thank you to Doodle Pantry. There's a whole page of them there. I'm not sure about the paper as I've lost the cover but it's from a 12 x 12 stack and it could be DCWV. The card is 6"X6".
The light brown marker cap was colored with E11, E13, and hints of E35.
Only around 100 of these beautiful hand silk-screen babies exist! How much are they worth? Absolutely nothing monetarily! But to me the Wild Wigout Comix Game Boards are classic works of underground art!
Now because all these rah-rah motherfuckers keep asking “hey can I get a list of all the Outlaws at regionals” I figured I’d put one together. You know, because appeasement works so fucking well. But, you’re going to have to ask people for additions/corrections for several reasons:
The eyes never lie. No one’s eyes are darker than Eryx's. Not even the Devil’s.
Welcome visiting dancers by including them in our Birthday/Visitor Jam (Email us names/cities or tell the DJ)
Put down the Book, put on
Tom Court, Rory Best and Declan Fitzpatrick look set to get the nod in the pack, while Johann Muller and Dan Tuohy will provide a stern test up against Cullen and Thorn in the lineout.
Spaten-Franziskaner-Bräu Franziskaner Hefe-Weisse
Mix first 5 ingredients together. Mix next 7 ingredients together in a separate bowl. Combine the two mixtures. Add the fruit and vegetables and fold into mixture.
A protest is planned for Saturday in Hyde – the setting of a recent gang attack by an ‘Asian’ gang on 2 white men, 1 of whom was aged 17.
On the bus we are briefed not to help the children climb trees or to find the solution for them but allow them to sort out their own problems. Christa gives the example of a new member of staff who came out for the first time and saw a child trying to fish a plastic bag out of the stream with a short stick. The adult gave the child a longer stick and said 'here try this'. Christa says this experience meant that the child did not get to make the learning that was possible in this situation. There was so much more learning that could have happened without the adults intervention.
So I set out to look for a great deal on 3 yards of fabric.
Can drown out my thoughts.
The scanner barely picks them up. In fact, I had to run a scan at 600 DPI to get them to show! You can see from the scan that there was no feathering or shadowing with any of the pens I used, and the Lumocolor is the only that bled. And the Lumocolor bleeds through most paper.
And he lived in a castle with a monster
FRESHLY BAKED BREADS:
I will also be blogging soon about our DREAM TOUR, coming up June 1 – August 30
What a crazy, wild ride this thing called life can be! This may sound corny, but I think it’s so important to make a list-either physical or mental-about the blessings in your life from time to time. Sometimes we’re too busy feeling sorry for ourselves to realize how good we really have it. And I want to add all my blog readers onto my list of blessings! Thank you just for being you!
Becoming something or someone else has its drawbacks and I have to admit that sometimes my characters, particularly the teenage ones, have a bit of a hard time and often tears are involved.
Some accounts have McClellan ardently opposed to this new medium on those grounds. I prefer a more rational theory: by 1908, McClellan had his eye on a new job -- president of Princeton University -- and in order to get that, he had to be seen as sticking up for higher morals. (Something Tammany candidates aren't exactly known for.)
COMPLETELY UNRELATED, but while searching for pictures for this post, I came across this photo entitled Typhoon Party on Okinawa July 1970 and it is one of the single most awesome pictures I have ever seen. Read the whole story accompanying it too.
Tangrams are another fun alternative. I found a Powerpoint version of Grandfather Tang's Story my first year teaching (and did not own the book yet). I liked it because it could then be projected and was entertaining for the kids to watch. I do not recall where it came from any longer, but here is a link to the copy I have...as well as tangram picture mats for the kids to try to make.
There was a time when I seriously thought about pursuing law. I wanted to be a human rights’ lawyer, one who had more pro bono cases than one could count, who wore slippers with a suit to courtrooms just to be disrespectful, and who traveled to remote places in Mindanao to get “accidentally” killed in an ambush attack by a rival politician’s private army.
He is my world, he completely defines me – completely!
10. Our Little Secret - 1958
The Brewers Association is a not-for-profit organization that keeps track of production statistics for all the breweries in the USA. Fun fact? They report that of the 50 largest breweries in the country, 36 of them are now craft breweries.
My beautiful colors, and the air
...Happy Chaos! Yes, we're back to that. No news there, right?
lime juice (or lime wedges)
If we are talking about just knitting and crochet I am pretty well committed to knitting. I enjoyed my crochet projects from last year and I am eager to try more in the future, but the motion of crochet isn’t quite as comfortable as knitting for me and I don’t find myself as inspired by the current selection of crochet patterns as I am by the knitting patterns.
But it is too simplistic to claim that government support is the only reason China has had some B2B success. The strength of the country’s scientific and technical talent is growing, and local companies increasingly bring real capabilities to the table. What’s more, a number of government-supported innovation efforts have not been successful. Some notable examples include attempts to develop an indigenous 3G telecommunications protocol called TDS-CDMA and to replace the global Wi-Fi standard with a China-only Internet security protocol, WAPI.
finances – fruit is – worry
Now I'm not the greatest fan of Martyn's Phil Collins collaborations from t'early eighties but I've got to say he won me over. He's got a great little jazzy band behind him that helps a lot obviously, but he can still do it even stuck in a wheelchair and weighing over twenty stone. 'Cooltide', Some People Are Crazy', 'Sweet Little Mystery' and 'Johnny Too Bad' stood out for me and the bass playing was exquisite. Mr Martyn can still sing and play a bit an' all.
Starbuck can be perceived as the Archangel Michael, and Leoben may be perceived as Archeia Faith.
I was somewhere outside of Ludlow, California, headed due east for Kentucky, when I realized that I would be a liar for the rest of my life.
It’s fun sometimes to be so polarizing!
Hang it on a shelf in good health and good time.
Thrilled to be posting this new born session! Cameron is the newest addition to my extended family; and what an adorable addition he is.
I know I don't blog regularly or nearly often enough, but I hope that those that do stumble across my page can find the same support, tips for an easier life, laughter, and hope that I find in the pages I follow.
Linden Lab c.1999, 2011
The second speaker was our teacher and great trend watcher, Vincent Albers. He told us about cultural indicators. Cultural indicators can help you choose the best fitting business strategy or creating campaigns for certain target groups. Every culture has it’s own habits and values, for example, in the one culture individualism stands for success and in the other culture it stands for someone who is selfish. To measure some of these important cultural habits there are ‘the five cultural dimensions’: Power Distance Index, Individualism, Masculinity, Uncertainty Avoidance Index and the Long-Term Orientation. On the website www.geert-hofstede.com you can see the score of the five cultural indicators for different countries with an explanation below.
Therefore, we must ask ourselves when we see miracles and signs: How do we know if a sign is from God? We know by the same yardstick of God’s teaching and by the example of Jesus’ own works. We know that God doesn’t deal in parlor tricks and when he moves there is no doubt. We know that Jesus performed miracles humbly, even going as far as to perform miracles away from crowds and to urge secrecy (Mark 7). God is not a showman, he is interested in restoring lives. Even pharaoh’s magicians could whip up some plagues, and even a motivational speaker can make people fall down. Just because it’s a spirit doesn’t mean it’s the spirit, and just because people hoot and holler doesn’t mean its any more spiritual than a rock concert. Just because somebody is charismatic it doesn’t follow that they are spirit filled. Just because someone is pious it doesn’t follow that they are closer to God’s character. Listen closely, people can be radical and be wrong.
my son found me in the hallway where i was going through their school backpacks making sure homework was done and looking for papers that i needed to sign.
Well... first of all Happy May Day! I'm the one who is always saying I'm determined to keep May Day alive... and "I" almost forgot it :( Thanks to my sis.... who reminded me. I used to love May Day as a kid. Do kids even do it anymore? Please tell me yes. I'm so out of the loop of things, fill me in will you?
Unpredictable movement of some numbers of demonstrators
6% ABV
Quick post as I have no time to work on this for now. Ages ago I read a book, I think by Arthur C. Clarke, where powerful atomic bombs were used to generate radar pulses so powerful, the return signal was used to map the entire solar system in one go. The grandeur of this vision impressed me a lot, and I hope that one day we can do it. (Btw, if anybody knows the name of the book, please share!).
Hope you all have a relaxing and fun week-end!
I lived in the 2nd Arrondissement by the Place des Victoire for five years, and every day I stepped outside my door, I felt like I was in a fairy tale. I live in the 20th Arrondissement now, and I've grown to love and appreciate its greenness, its young creator energy, the wonderful food that surrounds me, and being in a real neighborhood. But I have to say that the center of Paris is my spiritual home. Probably the 2nd (or 1st) Arrondissement would still be my favorite spot. Beauty, history, convenience. Ah...
First, LinkedIn is a mainline business tool. There are 90 million users on LinkedIn (March, 2011), most of whom are in the business world. They use it, and expect you to be on it. Please don’t disappoint.
I have saved fabric ribbon for decades and finally found a use for this lovely pink/mauve ribbon I received on a Christmas package. I used it as an area for holding needles. Eventually the bottom of the case will have some magnetic strips-- also used for holding needles. All in all this was a fun project and I will definitely be making more!
I can’t believe how long it’s been since I’ve done a post on here. Dec. 31, 2010 was my last post, so my apologies to my subscribers or those checking in. I have thought about doing a post for so long, yet somehow each day, as I tell myself I will do one today! – I don’t. I can’t for the life of me figure out why I procrastinate so much, they say there has to be a pay off, but I can’t figure it out. Do any of you procrastinate? How do you overcome it? I know with blogging that it’s essential to be consistent and yet I don’t. A little self-sabotage me thinks! Please share with me any tips you have to stop procrastinating by leaving a comment, I just love getting comments!
Over the past 40 years, median house prices have doubled relative to household incomes in the Golden State. Why? In 1998, Dartmouth economist William Fischel found that California's housing had been nearly as affordable as the rest of the nation until the more restrictive regulations, such as development moratoria, urban growth boundaries, and overly expensive impact fees came into effect starting in the 1970s. Other economic studies, such as by Stephen Malpezzi at the University of Wisconsin, also have documented the strong relationship between more intense land-use regulations and exorbitant house prices.
Social workers carried out a full risk assessment, they said.
My Mother’s Daughter
09. ... (3:12)
100g plain chocolate chips
With just a tiny bit of prep during the weekend, a plate of delicious scrambled eggs is less than 5 minutes away. Seriously. You can time it. I’ll provide a recipe for you to try out, but really, the perfect weekday eggs are more of a method. When you have a little extra free time in the kitchen, pull out your food processor and puree some scramble-worthy vegetables and olive oil. I used a tomato, shallot, and parsley but I think mushrooms, zucchini, and/or spinach would be other good options. Store the concoction in the fridge and use it as the base for your scrambled eggs when you’re in a hurry. As a bonus, I found that this method yields consistently nice, soft scrambled eggs (as opposed to those dry, overcooked bits you might get when you’re rushing to get out the door and trying to multi-task…oops.) I’m not sure why this is, but I’ll take it.
Shadows of the world appear.
So that's it, really. Nothing more to say. Just to put that final full stop and end this blog once and for all. Nothing more; the end.
Let the anxious contract you’ve unwittingly written evolve slowly and uncomfortably into a relationship. Find shared interests and common ground like sushi, and folk music. Build an impenetrable bastion upon that ground. Make it sacred. Retreat into it every time the air gets stale, or the evenings get long. Talk about nothing of significance. Do little thinking. Let the months pass unnoticed. Ask her to move in. Let her decorate. Get into fights about inconsequential things like how the fucking shower curtain needs to be closed so that it doesn’t fucking collect mold. Let a year pass unnoticed. Begin to notice.
Davis was far exceeding my expectations in 2011 before his collision with David Wright. I am hoping desperately that the ankle injury he suffered is not something that lingers throughout his career and stops what Mets fans are hoping is a stellar homegrown player from staying on the field and productive.
"If you outlaw guns, only outlaws will have guns"
front view
Alfred did not neglect in conveying to me the difficult times in his life. He had spoken about discrimination against the Irish, anti-intellectualism in America, and the McCarthy era. He had simply adored Robert ‘Cal’ Lowell and in one somber moment Alfred described to me in harrowing detail a night that Cal showed up at Athens Street in full manic rage. Lowell was dear to Alfred. He admitted that in those days little was known of mental illness, although Lowell would later improve with lithium. A professor I had at USC who had had Lowell for a graduate seminar saved the paper that Lowell commented on. Alfred went dark describing that long-ago night when Lowell had appeared at his house in a maniac rage. The account was both harrowing as it was sobering. I’ve read Lowell biographies but what Alfred described to me has not been written about. It has since made me admire Lowell’s ability to write at all. With that said, I will not detail it nor will I describe Alfred’s pain and horror at the meeting between Robert Frost and Ezra Pound at a time when Pound was being evaluated for legal action for his war-time radio broadcasts. This was before St. Elizabeth’s Hospital. Try as I might to be objective, I cannot read Frost’s poetry.
P.S. I have had several requests to post more pictures of cakes, so I have listened and I am happy to share. This was the birthday cake I made for my Mom last month. The cake details are listed below:
Now, opposing Saddam and the Sunnis were the Kurds, and the Shia. After the US invasion, the Sunnis were the most active guerrillas fighting the US presence in country, but recently they were literally paid off using US taxpayer money. US soldiers simply started to give large sums of money to the Sunni leaders in exchange for them not shooting Americans anymore. It worked... somewhat (Americans are of course still targeted, because they are occupying a foreign country etc).
Imperceptibly changing, the mores of a time;
And the Mumme Poll is a fan poll, not a blogger poll (not that those two characterizations are mutually exclusive). We welcome the participation of any college football fan. From anywhere – this isn’t just for Georgia fans, or SEC folks.
So now I'm switching gears, into one of focusing on the positive, thinking of all the cool people I'm going to meet (there are only a few people whom I've already met who are going to be there, as far as I know!), on the fact that I'm going to get to go to a talk by John Taylor Gatto, and on how much fun the slides and wavepool in the waterpark are. ;-) If you're going to be there, I'd LOVE to meet you!! So if you recognize me, please do say hi, and if not, well, I just hope we run into each other at a talk or something! :-)
Before His denial, Peter had asserted that even if all others denied Christ, he would not. So Jesus begins by asking that question — “do you love Me more than these?” A humbled Peter drops the comparison and simply asserts, “Yes, Lord, you know that I love you.” So Jesus presses further, “Do you love Me?” That is, “Do you? Do you really love in the way that you say you do?” And Peter asserts that he not only loves Jesus, but that Jesus knows that he does. One final time Jesus asks, “Do you love Me?” The force of this seems to be, “Peter, as you reflect on your inward desires and passions, do you really love Me?” Peter was grieved over this third question, perhaps because it reminded him of his denials and perhaps because it had to be asked three times, but he responds, “Lord, you know all things. You know that I love you.” In this final affirmation he is just as emphatic as he was in his final denial in which he invoked the curses of God (Mt. 26:74). Yes, he loves Christ.
What the deuce? Who’s the incredibly rude girl?
Oh dear.
Fast forward 19 years. We are now in a newly formed Dinner Club where the hosts choose a menu and divvy up the courses of the meal to the attendees. Jonathan and I were asked to bring the dessert, which I thought was awesome. The whole evening was based on Rick Bayless and his Frontera recipes. We had the choice of making….wait for it….Flan de Cafe or Chocoflan! Jonathan was pretty excited that at last I would learn how to make this dessert.
I'm so glad you've stopped by today, please make sure you hop on over to visit the other Blog Team members!
48. Try abseiling (again, what is this?)
* Pogroms
(search for scatter)
The last time Mercury was retrograde directly opposite your sign was in September 2009. This is always an indication that you have to face old issues with partners, especially ex-partners. It could mean you are similarly dealing with old issues with close friends as well. Whatever the case, all this stuff is back on your plate again. Oy! The downside of Mercury is feeling frustrated with delays. But the upside of Mercury (and incredibly, there is an upside) is that you can quite easily expedite things or finish things or bring them to a conclusion now. Wouldn't it be nice to get rid of this once and for all? Some of you, however, are not dealing with old issues. You're just running into ex-partners -- and all that that implies. (Yikes!)
like ----. I fell off the horse and onto my butt. This stinks, this way more than stinks. I know I feel like this because I didn't work hard. I got distracted. I played around with my new phone. I was frustrated with the kids when they weren't listening. And I am so damn tired of my husband not being home at night (because he works two jobs) to help. I feel like a total failure. Do you ever feel this way? It sucks. This is where I fail. This is where I stop. This is when I say what the hell is the point of all of this anyway?
--the need for more jobs and economic development in Brooklyn
I'm not sure I can do it. I'm not sure I can just sit back and DO NOTHING. I keep putting it off, but I know that unless I make a commitment, eventually I'll DO SOMETHING.
Die Hard (action, crime, thriller)
West Point Holiday Special ... FOX NEWS ... 4 AM *NEW
We stayed in Chennai for a few days and then decided to get a train to Pondicherry. I had wanted to visit Pondicherry ever since reading a wonderful book, Life of Pi, which begins in that city. Pondicherry is still heavily influenced by all things French as it was formerly a French colony. There are lots of very pretty pastel houses in streets with French names and in fact the city is divided into the French quarter and the Indian quarter and lots of people living there speak in French, which was bit disconcerting! It sits beside the Bay of Bengal and has lovely stretches of clean beaches and plenty of interesting shops. It`s known as a holiday get away for Indians and we liked it so much we stopped there for several days. Indian women go paddling in their sari`s and it`s just incredibly rich and colourful to see. The police, many of them women, wear uniforms of pale and dark blue camouflage. One time I bought some candy floss from a guy on the beach and a police officer came up to him rapping his knuckle with her baton, she told him to give me more bags and that he had ripped me off, as if I really minded. The only strange event I witnessed was when a very, very old lady came on to the beach, she was filthy dirty and obviously had some sort of mental health issue. Smiling and laughing to herself, she slowly twirled around on the sand then gradually lifting her swirling skirts she sank to the beach and poo`d. Nobody seemed to mind and that`s India for you.
I spent the last year of my life with a man who told me he thought I was beautiful maybe 5 times at maximum, always made sure I knew there were a million other females that wanted him and drummed into my head that if we broke up I would never do better but he on the other hand would have no problems; whether he used those exact words isn’t relevant. I loved this man, still do; but I realise I put up with a lot of shit because I felt less than I am; funny what a man can do to your self esteem huh!
"J.T." was directed by Robert M. Young, who later went on to direct eps of the newer "Battlestar Galactica" series. The film was written by Jane Wagner, who is comedian Lily Tomlin's long-time partner. Talk in 1973 of turning "J.T" into a tv series faded.
Hope you're all having a lovely weekend, tomorrow I'm off to buy birthday presents (not for myself, sadly), and begin the hunt for a perfect pair of jeans, as I own about two pairs, neither of which fit me, however I find trousers the most tiresome things to shop for, so I'll probably just end up getting cupcakes and a Starbucks instead!
The FTC does not investigate identity theft cases, but they can share information that you give them, such as the identity theft report number, with investigators nationwide. For more information about fighting back against identity theft, visit the FTC’s Identity Theft website.
I don’t understand the groups. I’ve searched on there for a job, once or twice, and had some interest once, only once. These kind of results make me feel like it’s pointless, but yet I have an account because, well, everyone else has one. I think of Linkedin the way I think about those plastic, photo-inserts in my wallet. Sure, I have them, but I don’t ever use them, at least not for their intended purpose. I may jam a receipt in there every now and again, but they certainly don’t contain photos! I mean, my photos are on my phone! Isn’t that the way it goes now?
“And may you grow strong
Evelyn’s (Judi Dench) husband has just died. While sorting through the estate, Evelyn is unable to deal with both her loss and the financial mess her life has become. She heads to the hotel to start her life over, including finding a job there.
My mom always smells really good; I’m pretty sure she smells better than all the other moms out there.
Watts
Imagine that you are one of the top people in your field. Imagine that you have worked hard for 15 years to not only master a demanding art form, but contributed significantly to the development of that art form. In so doing, you've proudly made a good living, supported yourself and your wife, risen out of your humble circumstances, and even managed to buy a large house in a nice neighborhood.
Sonia claims she was born in Besano, near Turin in italy. However, as per her birth certificate, She is actually born is Luciana, in the borders of Switzerland. A resort town for German soldiers during war.
Cobra Beer LTD Krait Prestige
EAU DE COLOGNE P6293
This example happens to be at Filoli Gardens in Woodside CA
2. Find a flesh and blood group of peers who you can dialog with. I prefer faith communities. Though not without their perils, they assume deeper meaning in the universe and attempt to process the challenges of living through that understanding. This lends itself to hope, and perseverance. Sometimes—especially in the storm, that is everything you need to make it through. You don’t need to agree with everything they say or think or do. You simply need them. Go out, meet your neighbors, invest at a local club, try a church or synagogue or mosque. Find fellowship with those around you.
Written by, Holly A.
We have tortured the logic of advertising and tied ourselves up in knots to the point that we no longer believe the evidence of our eyes. Yes, as a former science teacher I know full well there are times when science is right and our instincts are wrong. But this isn't one of them.
J+O March 2 at 12:48pm
These are not the only hypnotic words. There are others. But these three are particularly powerful, and particularly useful to us as marketers and salespeople.
N.B. The cola didn't really do anything to my toilet. I don't know if that's because it wasn't regular cola rather than diet.. or if I've just been reading silly things online.
I forgot to post the winner of the last Holiday Customer Rewards drawing and the Nurse Tilda Candy.
Same as it ever was….
Indeed, the 28th of February, we’ll both have 20 years.
The autistic boy is believed to be the father of the infant in the case.
I don't know exactly what arrangements were made but Dad was able to get the house for the Stantons; rent $15 a month. Next day or so found us with new neighbors and we children excited with the prospect of new playmates. That prospect soon appeared hopeless. The two older children definitely weren't socialized.
*not a fuck, because we are all doomed and ruled by the EUssr anyway.
I had absolutely no shame in cheating in GTAIII. Instantly getting the fuzz off my back after going on a killing spree was such a relief. The no wanted level cheat was probably the first among GTA cheats that I memorized. And the weapons cheat. Ohhhh, the weapons cheat. Shooting people with a pistol is alright. Burning them to a crisp with the flame thrower, blowing them up with a rocket launcher? AWESOME. The rocket launcher was especially delightful to use. At times I would find some high ground and start shooting people and nuking cars. When the cops brought out a helicopter, I'd just take aim and it was down in a matter of seconds. But the granddaddy of all cheats would have to be spawning a tank. Talk about power. The tank was nigh unstoppable. Any car it touched was instantly blown up, which made me laugh like a madman every time police cars would try to stop me. The tank has never been as strong in a GTA game as it has in GTAIII, able to take a sizable amount of punishment before you can't use it anymore. As a result, it isn't as fun to use in later installments. A shame, really.
Here are a few questions I must ask:
And so it is ever thus, simplicity allowing room for all
So when you are working with a confidence coach or instructor the thing to make sure of is not about what THEY do, how they choose to ride and train their horses – it is about how they will support YOU in YOUR journey to confidence in YOUR world.
And stands about the woodland ride
"The judge said if she pays she won't go to jail," I said. "All she has to do is make payments."
The Police brand has a broad selection of items including sunglasses, jewellery, watches, timepieces and fragrances. Most noteworthy of these items are the sunglasses as they marked the birth of the brand.
Here in the dark, in these final hours
welcomed it as one of their own.
Ugh. Any movie that spends that long in development is bound to be awful. It proves there is not a good, obvious vision for the story. Look at Indiana Jones and the Kingdom of the Crystal Skull as a fine example of what nearly twenty years of development will do for a film. But add to that the horrible idea of hiring Tim Burton to direct and you have a mess.
And your
Kendall Stewart
Chelsea Market
As you know I have been working on my crafts for the upcoming craft fair in November. I figure because it is in November I should have some nods to Christmas.
Her therapist met her on the stairs and walked in with her. This was an informal hearing or more of a review, but it was still going to make decisions for her life none the less. She sat by her lawyer and waited for the judge to come into the room and take his seat at the head of the large conference table. Her husband Jeff was sitting across from her on the other side.
In few areas has the indoctrination designed at the destruction of Western Society been more cruelly effective than what it has done to women. In a few generations a sex which once valued honour, virtue and motherhood, now finds themselves either grasping at the Muslim veil of their own subjugation or, tragically with some merit, viewed as “easy meat” by our nations new colonisers, leaving many of the most vulnerable in huge danger.
Besides achieving a PB, I wanted to finish the race injury-free as well. However, I didn't manage to do any pre-race stretching due to the delay at the bag deposit counter. That got me worried. There was nothing that I could do, but to listen to my body with every stride.
Welcome to the "Hopping Through The Holidays" Blog Hop. Come hop along with the design team members of Creative Kuts and Scrapping Bug Designs November 19th and 20th. You will see some awesome projects using both Creative Kuts and Scrapping Bug Designs paper piecing patterns. We’re super excited to be doing this hop together! Our design team members will be showcasing their amazing creations they have created especially for this hop. This hop will feature projects for both Thanksgiving and Christmas. Our intentions of doing this hop is to show each and everyone of you all the wonderful projects you can create using Creative Kuts and Scrapping Bug Designs paper piecings. We hope to give you some great ideas and inspiration through out this amazing blog hop.
The UK’s budget deficit ballooned by 50% in March, to £18.2bn from £12.bn in February. Year-on-year, it is still very slightly up. In the fiscal year through March, spending rose by 2% thanks to the government’s alleged “programme of cuts”.
The excursion will be for two days and one night. But with campsites set up for 6 people, we could wind up sharing our site with kids – this program is aimed at families, after all. So if we’re gonna do this, we should start recruiting other first-timers who might be interested in a night of camping.
6. Don't forget to buy a shiny whistle.
King (and most other notable tax proponents like Warren Buffett) are terribly confused in that they think giving more money to the government to make these decisions is somehow giving more money to the ‘country’. It’s not.
Yet, echoes of memories pierced his eyes
footprints will
Insincerity
Liz made Helen this jewelry organizer. She got drawer pulls and a piece of molding from the hardware store, polyurethaned the molding, and put in the drawer pulls. Here it is hanging on Helen's bulletin board already full of necklaces.
3.Resolution: 1024
Back to work... Or... just... to work. Good night.
You may remember that this past fall when Jenny and Pip pulled out the tote of Thanksgiving decorations, they discovered that they were all covered in a horrid, psychedelic colored slimy mold.
I figured I would put all of my little yummy cupcakes in one spot for you to check out on this
There were some moments where I was going a bit stir crazy but I luckily managed to get myself up and do something to distract myself.
Amazon.com: Customer Discussions: Yeah!! Amazon is cracking down on self promoters!!Part of the new rules-"....With the advent of the new community, we will no longer allow self-promotional posts in other communities. Starting on Saturday, May 14th, all "shameless self promotion" activity will be limited to the `Meet Our Authors' community. Promotional threads outside of these forums will be removed." We have officially been put in our place.
Jane Dystel, President of Dystel & Goderich Literary Management
"The object of this Essay is to assert one very simple principle, as entitled to govern absolutely the dealings of society with the individual in the way of compulsion and control, whether the means used be physical force in the form of legal penalties, or the moral coercion of public opinion. That principle is, that the sole end for which mankind are warranted, individually or collectively, in interfering with the liberty of action of any of their number, is self-protection. That the only purpose for which power can be rightfully exercised over any member of a civilised community, against his will, is to prevent harm to others. His own good, either physical or moral, is not a sufficient warrant. He cannot rightfully be compelled to do or forbear because it will be better for him to do so, because it will make him happier, because, in the opinions of others, to do so would be wise, or even right. These are good reasons for remonstrating with him, or reasoning with him, or persuading him, or entreating him, but not for compelling him, or visiting him with any evil in case he do otherwise. To justify that, the conduct from which it is desired to deter him must be calculated to produce evil to some one else. The only part of the conduct of any one, for which he is amenable to society, is that which concerns others. In the part which merely concerns himself, his independence is, of right, absolute. Over himself, over his own body and mind, the individual is sovereign."
A spokesman for the university said:
How do we gain control? Through some hard, thoughtful work and patience.
There’s no better way to wind down from all that wedding planning stress then to pamper yourself with the full VIP treatments. A hen party where a sauna, massage, and facial is all on the menu, it could be just what you need before the big day.
"Nobody wants to give books to a writer," a relative told me. "It would be like we were setting up unreasonably high bar for your book." And then, I swear to god, he patted me on the head. Which, for those of you watching at home, is how Midwesterners participate in the soft tyranny of low expectations. (Also, I would like to say yet another prayer of thanksgiving that none of my relatives know how to work the internet.)
There it is!: Your National Scrapbooking Day Hampton Art inspiration! Hopefully you are going to be heading to a crop or logging onto one of the many online events tomorrow.
i am going to book a cab from gatwick airport. i ve found a company a bit cheaper than the others, the internet site seems very well made and they seem serious. There is a license number and i would like to check if it's real or not before to book online!
I chose to back my page with a sheet of cardstock weight patterned paper, because it already had that pretty top corner ~ MME Follow Your Heart/"Bee Happy" Be You.
She had also accused the council of towing away cars at 10.30pm.
The world now knows—or should know—that China's legions are on the march. On 27 October, the fifth plenary session of the 17th Chinese Communist Party Central Committee considered and passed a set of Proposals for the National 12th Five-Year Plan for Economic and Social Development. The Proposals emphasize the importance of invention and creativeness, both of which are said to be essential for China's continued economic success. Special mention was given to the role of independent innovation, especially in core and common technologies, to help promote scientific and technological breakthrough. The Chinese, taking a leaf from the USA and some other developed jurisdictions, also plan to make the machinery of enterprise run more smoothly by fostering market and industry–research–university partnerships.
J: I usually always attend the Romance Writer’s of America conference, which switches location every year. I don’t do many other conferences, but I have now and then.
In this system, it's acceptable to let a 70 year old, die while giving care to a 25 year old, because their life is worth more to the collective - excuse me - worth more to society. To paraphrase their quote, "it's not discrimination to deny care to the 70 year old and give it to the 25 year old. Everyone who is now 70 was once 25 and the majority of those who are 25 now will be 70 some day". In other words, "we can screw you now because we didn't screw you earlier; and if we're not screwing you now, wait until you're 70 and then you'll really be screwed." The implications are obvious: if a twenty-something needs a liver or kidney transplant and a suitable donor person below 10 or over 50 (judging by Emanuel's chart) is available, these ethics standards say go ahead and kill the kid or kill the grandma and get the working "unit" back to work so "it" can make money and pay taxes to the mighty Fed.gov hydra.
There are more things I don't want from an agency. But they'll have to wait for another post. Right now, I've got a very important thing to do involving a bar, some beerz, another bar, an Indian restaurant, a gentleman's entertainment provider, a hotel room and some gaffer tape.
Actually, it was supposed to be released in 1987. Thinking the album evil, Prince shelved it. Yet, a fan should still own it, mostly because of the song “Bob George”, an evil guilty pleasure. Usually known to alter his voice to a higher pitch, Prince lowers it on this song. In this voice he makes fun of himself. “Prince?! Ain’t that bitch! That skinny muthafucka with the high voice?!” Actually, this song is a blueprint for future rap lyrics involving cussin’ out and smackin’ women, reason why it’s a guilty pleasure.
Industries such as medical care or education, flexible arrangement may be difficult but not impossible. Having flexible scheduling allows staff members to take care of family responsibilities without impacting the business or the career path.
It wasn't deliberate but they are nearly all Attachment Parenting mums.
How can the association be made? How to “point to” a particular organ or tissue in the body and make it appear associated? This is cunning. The keys are the emotional reactivity and any general statements that are made, which the targeted person unwittingly accepts as valid.
Just a quicky update!: I wanted all of you to check out krazyrayray’s channel on YouTube (NOT advertising at all *I don’t know the uploader*). I am just in love with all her videos and she makes the best Haul videos.
The little girl stuff was sorted into groups for keeping and groups for sending to Goodwill.
I ran across, in one of the blogs, the essence of all that is wrong with the educational system.
With another scrap: "you $1,000.00 cash" and "Hall $5000.00" Remember, in 1962 you could buy a new car for around $3000, and a new home for $13,000. The average income was $5500 a year. So what in the world do all these large dollar sums mean?
Soak the gelatine in the buttermilk for 10 minutes.
Now for the good one! The authors Diana diZerega Wall and Anne-Marie Cantwell, are professors of anthropology at the City University of New York and Rutgers University-Newark, respectively. They have put together these walking tours, in all the boroughs except Staten Island*, to help tourist and resident alike learn more about the history of the city.
MORTLOCK is a gothic, Victorian horror show, in all the best ways.
“Let me tell you, with regard to the Christians, in general, there is a problem, which I raised at the third conference, held in Doha, as well as at the interfaith dialogue conference in Mecca, convened by the Saudi monarch a year and a half ago.
NCHS appears to have solved the problem and now everyone who dies can be placed in an acceptable category. Since each death involves a heart that stops beating, deaths for ‘unknown’ reasons have become deaths from ‘heart attacks.’
BEAST will be starting off the concert in Seoul on February 4-5th, 2012 and move on to Germany (Berlin), England (London), Spain, America (3 cities), Canada (2 cities), Singapore, Japan (5 cities), Thailand, Taiwan, Indonesia, Philippines, Hong Kong, and more totaling to 14 countries, 21 cities, and 35 concerts.
2010.09.08 Iraq Kirkuk 4 10 Four people are mudered by Islamic bombers.
Use of Spanish: Purchase of cell phone by Linda
the card shape is a Go Kreate Die and seeing as the image is quite large I've not overly embellished it lol,
Pierre and I talked about plans for the children. He said their building was basically untouched but they were afraid to put the children back in as aftershocks continue to periodically hit the city. He was also concerned about food, water, and safety…the same things everyone else is struggling with at this moment. After our talk I drove around the city searching for large bags of water I could bring the kids. After an hour of driving I returned with 80 tiny bags of water. It was all I could find, but it was completely insufficient for the 175 or so children and workers.
products look good on paper, their scores and numbers sound right but do you want to be around this person? Are they bland? Too aggressive? Or, enjoyable and fun? We’re Tulane girls and to us well roundedness is everything; many snacks do not pass our Foodtrainers’ taste tests. We get a lot of applicants and while we don’t send rejection letters per se, if you look in our recycling bins, you’ll know not everyone is admitted.
So, about my camera. I’m pretty sure it’s kaput, but I’m going to take it to Best Buy just to make sure. I’m sad because this was my birthday gift from my dad three years ago, but life goes on. Ironically, I was out to dinner with my dad when the “accident” occurred (“accident” is code for me being a doofus).
And it's such a mess. So unfair. And dare I say it, so selfish. But maybe it's just as selfish to think I could have made any real difference. I don't know.
I sadly have to admit that I do not have as yet any Copics or Pro Markers :(
